Isn't this against the first amendment? Doesn't the first amendment give us the right to assemble and protest?
oil.
Yeah nice... Except for the fact that everyone who contracted AIDS back then did not even know that the disease even existed.  He is clearly alluding to gay sex as being the cause as this is what religious nuts like Paul used to cry about.
Bro, I figuratively just watched that episode.
this is why u can't vote
It's a Wizard Photograph, Harry.
Upvote for Albert fan boyz
:) Congrats to all of the Houses!
Saying Karthus and morg counter Xerath because they can land skill shots when locus is active is silly. Locus Power enable Xerath to do long ranged, safe harass, and should never be used to make him vulnerable to attacks. If anything, Xerath counters Karthus and even morg to some extend due to his superior pushing and killing potential. Fizz and Sion on the other hand are pretty good counters to Xerath.
as Chaox seems to say nonstop "real?"
Got it. Thank you so much for the advice.
Lot's of down votes here.  I didn't know that many people hated bananas...
I am tired of fucking morons that don't know how to work a camera. I am now down voting ANY AND ALL videos that are filmed with a tall skinny aspect ratio instead of widescreen.
Yet you can still write that post on this website.
Dude what the fuck is your damage ?
Yep it's actually a larger topic then one might think. I know this is not the best answer, but I would generally do save for web, and click convert to sRGB. 
But they entirely miss the sim target. Always have. Plus they're notorious for not fixing bugs in their games. Just look at the F1 series.
Hallo?
I was introduced to it by hospital staff while recovering from a surgery, so I'm not really sure how you've decided it was "exclusively" designed for tourists mad about a TV show. You sound like one of those people who moved to NY after college and is now bitter because it isn't the pleasant bohemian experience you want. If that assumption about you is inaccurate, then consider fucking yourself for being a hypocrite who generalizes about others out of turn.
3rd place me? as unlikely as that is...
In politics, the ones that say what you want to hear get voted into office. They then proceed to run roughshod over your beliefs.
Help me connect my new computer it runs windows 2k.
WORST new years ever   *cries for the Bill of Rights*
What a great dress, you look really nice.
[Ahem](http://images.cheezburger.com/completestore/2011/12/31/f95ced41-2cd9-4f32-8d7c-78df82b985bf.jpg)
Damn, you beat me to it.
[Source](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6Z5jkYvKscw)
Weird how?
What the fuck has bailouts got to do with the poor. And he has called OWS 'all about handouts'. 
In 8th grade I decided to love Green Day and be a lesbian and got made fun of for that. Maybe it did some good because I have a better taste in music now. It bothered me but I decided to experiment with the "tell a teacher" method that I had been taught since I was little. Let me tell you, our school had a big name for their anti-bullying policy and that sign was up everywhere, but no way did those people do anything worthwhile. If someone had said that I should punch the shit out of them and not give a shit what trouble I got into, I know that would have stopped them sooner.
Whoah, totally missed this! Sorry for the late reply.  I'm going for %Boss as well. I'd just like my ignore up pretty high as well, helps a load with LHC.
Just you two?
fallout collection? http://steamcommunity.com/id/RogueRaider/
Sexasaurus Rex is too damn good.
nono, but he added a &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Yeah, I'm a spoiled fuck :3 I even have an old iPhone 3GS...
I should be clearer. I /have/ used Dev C++ (back in 2005-2006 when it was considered 'good'). I didn't find it crap though that might have changed.   However I haven't used dev c++ portable (and can't verify it actually works without administrative privileges). The OPs constraints are awfully limited as well. 'Quality' is not such a driving factor as much as portability, no administrative privs, etc.
[Also relevant](http://ecx.images-amazon.com/images/I/61LTn7KoCNL._SL500_AA280_.jpg)
DAMN DIRTY STONERS!
Is it me or do white rappers use young girls in videos and black rappers use same age and older girls in videos? 
Damn you and your teabagging.
The gravitational field is strong with this one.
Regardless of how misguided the effort may be, at least we are taking action.  What matters now is action.,  Action forces education.  The only access to results is action.  And by and large, we are decent people.
I wish I like NS flex patterns better.  They are just as much a tank as my usual rides.  All my friends ride NS boards and they do last.
I'm not sure why they would if the point of the vote was to get someone on the cover that nobody cared was affected by the curse or someone people wanted affected by the curse. 
I've bought XS from GAP stores in Canada.
Wait a second. Are you the real UkrainianLimbs?
That makes complete sense. Thanks! :)
Another question: Chassis or no chassis? 
Why not just choose gnome in 11.10?
And frankly, all this saves taxpayer money. They spend 60k on this and then have fewer people in the hospital on the governments dime.   It's the equivalent of giving out first 60k worth of first aid kits, which will prevent 500k of costs on our provincial healthcare system because people don't have to go to the hospital as often. 
*that* needs a tl;dr?
I lay on my sofa on reddit while my entire family went as well, good times. 
Someone played Boomer Sooner? Boomer Sooner.
gg to you too ;)
I was curious of that myself
As a Canucks fan, I would love a couple of amazing defensemen... maybe Dan Boyle or Kris Letang. We're in good shape right now, but having one of those guys in our top 2 D would be amazing.  
Don't ever move to New York.
Would you like HL2 or Day of Defeat: Source for Borderlands GOTY?
Part of the reason i don't go prepaid.  I am entirely too attached to my android phones, currently running a Galaxy S II and it's got to be one of the best Androids i have ever had.  I sit here and laugh to myself, because when i first started using cellular phones, they were in bags and you had to have an external power source to actually make a phone call (like an adapter for a vehicle power port)
I did read something similar with a tube sock (which I don't own), I'll have to try it.
They shouldn't let teens and preteens play online because they're all angry jerks because they need to get their sex on.
Don't worry if The_Python stays on reddit until midnight then we can count it as a year and blast away
Add me up. Gt: InsomniaxXx
Yeah, I'm good... I've got an 1000.
I got a few that I know are still 18+!  And I gots couches and whatnot if ya'll wanna pregame here :D
Malmö you say?   Probably a gang fight.
Shadowgate, maybe?
Please add me http://steamcommunity.com/id/goblinsandwich
The Dark Side of the Moon is what got me into Pink Floyd, and has been my favourite album of all time since the first time I heard it.  Wish You Were Here snugly sits at my number 2 favourite Pink Floyd album.  I have heard all fourteen.
There's two problems with this:  1. You might get a large variety of answers.  2. What they say might not be what is true.
Enjoy. and may you find all the answers to life.
I'm in the Falls too...didn't feel a thing.
No, read it...
What's casual about Torchlight that wasn't casual about Diablo? I played Diablo when it was new and it was pretty much the same as Torchlight AFAIR.
It's never a bad idea to get more!
I think it's because We Are The Music *Makers*....  I also think a lot of musicians are more insecure and self absorbed than they might admit. How dare someone *else* actually produce a song!?
She sucks.  
Thankyou! :D
if you promise... * [here's my small pipe](http://imgur.com/a/5yRH6) * [this is for spotting](http://imgur.com/a/3msmF)  EDIT: sorry, just read the rules :P  and i made these for the last competition
Wow.  Having done raw before (for about a year and a half, religiously), I am so not a fan.  lol  That said, this is an impressive collection of science.  Thank you for the link.
http://www.springerlink.com/content/h842v2702r60u481/  "While the between-species performance difference they report is apparent in their data, so too is a large difference in practice on their task: Ayumu had many sessions of practice on their task before terminal performances were measured; their human subjects had none. The present report shows that when two humans are given practice in the Inoue and Matsuzawa (2007) memory task, their accuracy levels match those of Ayumu. "
Spent my honeymoon here, nice place.
Hence my parenthetical remark.
it's ok, they usually stick to the machines.  Squat racks are empty year round
Just keep the body, you wont have to talk to her anymore. 
Most of these are a bit iffy, but teenage mutant ninja turtles really has no reason to be on this list.
THERE IS ONLY 6 STARS.  BLASPHEMY!!!!!!
-**Ribeye** is my favorite and easiest to cook. -**Porterhouse** to me is meh, it's just a strip sirloin and filet mignon on different sides.  More difficult to cook, filet has no beef flavor. -**Flatiron** is one of my more favorite cuts as its cheaper than most other cuts and has intense marbling but tends to not be as tender. -**Skirt** is alright if you are poor but most of the time its cut to be super thing and looks like flaps not ideal for steak cooking but for carne asada yes. -**Hangar steak** hard to find but it is firm yet a little bit tender and full of beef flavor, one of my new favorites. -**New York Strip**: one of my lesser liked cuts as its tough and very little marbling, if buying only buy prime cuts. -**Sirloin steak**: its tendy with a nice beef flavor I think of it as a between a ribeye and strip steak in terms of tenderness and beef flavor. tri tip: depending on price I will pick up prime grade if I can get it for the price of choice ribeye.  So my top 3 are: **1. Ribeye 2. Flatiron 3. Hangar** I know the last two can be hard to find so sirloin is a nice 4th option as well.
Do you hate your money?   Do you ever/did you ever  "Live poor" for shits and giggles?
I'm not. I extremely rarely downvote people as I think that's counterproductive for a good debate. I do tend to get downvoted myself a lot though :)
Anything you can tell us? Also congrats on the trip.
&gt;no official body to investigate or access the amount of damage  Law enforcement and the courts?  &gt;In general I don't know how the giant businesses that exist today would react to a political climate of deregulation, or if they could even be trusted with such a thing.  Well, in Paul's case I think we can see how they react to this climate. They try to silence it.
So do I.  Oh, well - there are always dreams.
you like terrible music.
i got him a downvote. hope he likes it.
True Stories
Robbie?
What the fucking fuck, dude?
Punch-line in the post title...
&gt;I hate to say it but I feel like the biological time to mate is during puberty.   It's really not. Women are most fertile between 24 and 26, iirc, and teen pregnancy carries a lot of inherent risks that more mature women are not vulnerable to. I think *guys* are most fertile or whatever in their teen years, but either way I don't think the "biological" excuse actually applies here at all.
Why so salty?
This and mischief brew all in one day?! Score!
Hey, back to the OP:  "best day of your life, *so far*".  Let's hear it for going as *far* as we can.
That was retarded!
nice to see this progress!
If high school was the best years of your life, then you have failed at life, or you are 20.  When you're 30 you hardly even remember who you went to school with besides the closest friends you still associate with.
No, actually. It's a replica.  While I'm correcting you: That probably would be better referred to as a "bust". Statues are generally larger. 
I think I am smart enough to draw such conclusions myself ...  Egypt might like to keep people dumb and not think for themselves but I think I've outgrown that by now..
I hear Oceans Marketing is looking for new clients. 
Perhaps make that 7 coals, and you might get some takers.
When I chose to be a werewolf, it was one of those moments that deserved chanting and dramatic music. Aela drained her blood into the basin in the Underforge and I took it greedily.   Then, I turned into a Werewolf. I can turn into a werewolf at will, but other then that, and the odd woman remarking about the sexy fur coming from my ears, nothing.  I really wanted being a werewolf to actually make a bigger difference than it did. 
Logged in on my boyfriend's computer just to make sure it made its way here.
Gotta love that Republican, Christian, Moral Right.
This must be what's growing in my bathroom.
Actually, Boxer waved at the camera while Cella was drinking.
So is the English language it appears. If your only response to any debate is telling the other side to Google your points for you, you've already lost, especially when whatever argument you made was proven 100% wrong. 
Try the new Stephen King book, [11/22/63](http://www.barnesandnoble.com/w/11-22-63-stephen-king/1030438404?ean=9781451627282&amp;itm=1&amp;usri=stephen+king). It's not horror, it's a very interesting take on time travel.  
No, they keep it pretty secret.
My 8 year old musically inclined daughter had a name for her fake band in the early 2000's....The Sassy Cats.  Still tease her about it now.
&gt;  I think to have to be 21 to own it, but not exactly sure about this.   21 to buy, 18 to own
Wow... you've done it for me. I'm now converted. Praise be to Jebus!!! Thank you so much for opening my eyes to the 'decent way' to live. Now I just need to start throwing the word 'faggot' around a little more often and I'll be set for reaching heaven no doubt!
Awesome. Good luck!!
Considering there was poop, ya I would say so.
I agree. Our secondary and run game will hold us back. We have a potent offense and our pass rush and defense against the run are top notch. I can see us beating a lot of teams like San Fran. But QB's like Rogers, Brees and Brady can do terrible things to our secondary. 
Why can't he line item veto the sections he doesn't like?  I see the bill is about defense spending, so why not line item veto the sections he opposes?  EDIT:  dyslexia
Oh, there you are, Perry.
Such a strange movie.  I think in general it's the scripted stuff that doesn't work, but as a visual representation of the wild and brilliant Rolling Thunder Review, it's actually pretty engaging.  Definitely some of the best concert footage of Dylan ever recorded, especially Isis and Tangled Up in Blue.  
All summoners must have 6 slots full of wards.
See? Ignorant dick.
Why should they? Generally, many things on [/r/atheism](/r/atheism) and even [/r/christianity](/r/christianity) are informative and/or interesting. However, most people just end up upvoting stupid bullshit like facebook posts to the top and burying the good stuff. They're fine subreddits, just the popular content is mainly assholery and circlejerking.
I am scared by the probable result that when you put those statements with Hitler, it will be either   1. They will claim he never said it, or 2. They will agree with him.
quit living in the past
CS:S for Trine and EYE?
As soon as you include content, you are obligated to support it. Bethesda's quality control is already laughable, imagine if they were expected to provide support for community code as well.  Most of the time, when a great idea is modded into the game, the development team simply steals the idea and adds in their own version instead. No legal qualms, and they maintain source control. See minecraft's pistons, or WoW's UI updates for examples of this in action.
He's kind of a creepy creeper in the books. I think they mis-stepped by casting him with an actor who was too charismatic for the character.
People dont care. Everyone has gone through it, unless you have terrible acne they won't notice. One of my close friends had horrible acne, and got prescribed medicine. Clear skin now! So don't bring yourself down, get to a doctor 
Cathnaziganjalism?
um.  What do ya mean when living alone?   I do this at work! O.O  Edit:  just came back to say I don't sing about cats at work. Ahem. 
atheism isn't offensive.  naive young atheists on here are very fucking offensive
But I didn't get you anything.  I know, we'll share!  If you liked LEO on the Cheap, the congressional [OTA put out some rather good related pubs](http://www.fas.org/ota/otareports/topic/stopics/) before short-sided politicians killed the program.   Examples:  (PDF links)  * [Reducing Launch Operation Costs: New Technologies and Practices](http://www.fas.org/ota/reports/8833.pdf) * [Big Dumb Boosters: A Low-Cost Space Transportation Option?](http://www.fas.org/ota/reports/8904.pdf) * [Affordable Spacecraft: Design and Launch Alternatives](http://www.fas.org/ota/reports/9003.pdf)
im australian
i think so, as i think it was made a little bit after tb did his wtf is of LoL. also, ya, hes the one who got me addicted. i really want him to start casting LoL torneeys, we need a few more good ones.
Why the fuck would anyone do that?
[tower of gay](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IVohBBNYOks)
Very good point. Thanks so much for the advice.
He's warning you about impending anal rape.
This is the guy btw ^^
Clean installation is pretty easy, just delete all files, except steam.exe and steamapps. Steam will then redownload all files.
Happy New Year, Feck this economy, I had to decide either to go out last nite with a group of friends and in-laws or tonite, last nite won. Had a great time, hope 2012 is  good one for you
Well signals generally come in the making out. the person have his/her hands all over you and kisses enthusiasticly. When your hands goes under his/her clothes he/she moves in ways to assist you, NOT twisting away, forcing you to be rough to reach where you want to go OR just lying still, ignoring you.  The person assists in his/her own undressing and helps pull the clothes of you. Actual moving to help with the sex.  If the person stops moving ABORT ABORT as he/she has now likely fallen asleep and sexual acts with unconscious person is rape.   If the person just lay there like a dead fish even though you KNOW he/she want's sex? Stop because what could be more of a turn off.
yes, those are penis noses.  Edit: more examples of their work (also NSFW) [Work for which they almost won Britain's prestigious Turner Prize](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/thumb/5/50/Chapman_Brothers._Death.jpg/300px-Chapman_Brothers._Death.jpg) [More here](http://images.artnet.com/images_US/magazine/news/nathan/jake-chapman-sir-norman-rosenthal-10-31-11-4.jpg) [and here](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/_O0_3cZOaXbs/TUi3Ox0StRI/AAAAAAAAFgQ/pDh5EVI2GKI/s400/artwork_images_113667_625472_jakedinos-chapman.jpg)
http://www.accessdata.fda.gov/cms_ia/importalert_107.html  http://www.cbp.gov/xp/cgov/newsroom/news_releases/national/04212011_2.xml  http://www.ctv.ca/CTVNews/World/20110422/kinder-surprise-eggs-ban-110422/
They do what Congress - who approves their budget line item by line item - tells them to do.
I agree.  It is important to make the setup and use of VOIP as simple as possible to maximize its adoption within the game and that can be challenging.  However, I'd say that games like MMOs, such as WoW, lend themselves towards the use text chat and private VOIP servers.  Back when I played WoW, I rarely wanted to talk to a random player and if I did, the gameplay provided me with ample time to type out complex messages.  With members of a guild, that was different; voice became an integral part of socializing and coordinating raids, etc.  For team FPS games, I often want to tell a random player something and the fast-paced gameplay makes it impossible to type out complex messages (unless I'm staring at the spawn screen).  Being able to bark out a warning or order to another player, even if it's unidirectional because the other player hasn't bothered to set up VOIP, is beneficial to gameplay, in my opinion.
I thought i was gonna see a dead deer dressed up like Rudolph. Phew.
If you reverse charges on a Steam purchase, they WILL disable your account.  Count on it.
Hopefully there wasn't a fruit bowl. 
Blog post about the case study [here](http://www.uncontrol.com/posts/a-interactive-brand-for-the-cooper-union/).
For the future, Essentials classes are the build options which came from the "Heroes of..." series. Thief, Knight, Slayer, Mage, Warpriest, Cavalier, etc. Essentials classes means only those classes are allowed, while Essentials only means that only the feats/powers/etc. in the Heroes of... books are allowed (which is what happens when you choose the "Essentials Only" option in the Character Builder).
[Then Bieber was bacon.](http://6.asset.soup.io/asset/1733/1462_295d.png)
Too bad you can only see half of it!
go for it. i got punched in the ribs and was floored last night
In South Korea I'm pretty sure this is punishable by death.
Just did the Rodeo Beach Trail Run in San Francisco. My first 20k with brutal climbing. Some of the most stunning views of the bay area from the Marin Headlands. Wanted under 3 hours and did it in 2:39! What a great way to end the year!
[](/priceless "but the hunting is the fun part!") All joking aside, I would downvote anyway. I just want to see what everypony thinks about this.
varg_18@hotmail.com
No. 
Nice!  I just signed up for a PDGA tourney today.  Can't wait for february...
post or pm me ur steam id
[Glenn Greenwald just did a huge piece](http://www.salon.com/2011/12/31/progressives_and_the_ron_paul_fallacies/singleton/) that talks all about the rift forming in the liberal camp about Ron Paul, and how Paul is more liberal on some things than Obama.  Also, [Jon Stewart](http://lmgtfy.com/?q=jon+stewart+loves+ron+paul) has a huge man crush on Ron Paul.
That's why it would be interesting on a 2v2. I'd like to see what strategies the pilots come up with in order to gain the edge over the enemy pilots.
&gt;The results are not a measure of you.   This is something I've got to remember.  However, it's hard to agree with sometimes.  How do you go after something, not get it, and not think "if I were better, more skilled, etc. I'd have suceeded"?  I really do agree with the "don't be outcome dependent" mentality, but in the moment, sometimes I lose it.  How do I get there? The truth is, I'm just impatient.  I want the skills now.  The answer, I'm sure, is just experience.  Maybe I'll take this as a lesson to improve my inner game and remember my values.  I value process, but it seems I want the reward without putting in the time.  This can't work.  Here's to keeping the dice rolling.  Thanks Whisper.
Well......I want to add something.....but you just said it all : D   Oh, and just because we're bronies doesn't mean we have to love everything.......you don't have to change your hole personality and become an all loving dude who gives tons of money to homeless people and saves animals in his freetime......don't get me wrong...it's awesome if you do it....but do it because you WANT to do it....not because you feel like you HAVE to do it to be a "real brony"....... 
I can't believe the top brass approved of this.
Some extra information: I've tried booting it on this computer and another computer, getting the same results.  Coincidence? 
Oh god so true. I need to write my will already just in case some shit like this goes down.
I'll definitely be buying torchlight 2.   I'm still tentative on D3... We'll see which one gets busted out at our monthly lan parties.
So is "displace" in this context a fancy word for "make homeless"?
I'm guessing the historical context would be helpful, yes?
I heard a rumor that a GM rage quit and slayed a bunch of people in Orgrimmar with a push of a button, turning them into sheeps and what not before doing it.  Do the developers have access to any charachters that can one shot slay like this on live servers? Special abilities, etc. 
Well seeing as my girl is about 5,000 miles away... and all my friends are out of town with family, I'm having a very forever alone New Years Eve. 
I don't recall the experimental data confirming the existence of virtual particles.   Infinite virtual energy would only be possible for an infinitely short time interval, presumably.
Are they flavored?
What do you have to do?
That's apples and oranges. You can't say "Direct sunlight in a nutrient devoid system doesn't grow algae, so too much light usually isn't the problem" when a tank is not even comparable to that.   The fact is that too much light is the cause of most kinda of algae. If your whole plan for keeping a tank algae free is to remove all the nutrients, then how do planted tanks get by?
"Anyone else arguing for their self interest is greedy. Got it."  Oh stop making things up. Your imagination is quite vivid.
Just posted there a moment ago as well. (Initially thought they were just for movies for some reason)  Thanks for the suggestion though.
"Burning an American flag is not a crime, but police charged the men with the careless use of a fire because they didn't use a fire pit"  wonderful. good thing the cops are defending the flag and all it stands for. like freedom of expression.
Thanks for gratuitiously attributing a male gender to me.
Why would martial law be imposed?
I find your comment to be sexually offensive.  Can I sue you now?
agreed. what for?
Under the radar? If this is what it feels like to "not be talking about the Patriots at all," then I sure don't think anyone in America wants to know what its like to be "sick of hearing about the Patriots." 
It's funny how men are the ones who can't stop thinking about sex when its women who wear makeup and clothes designed to flaunt...
by the way im 22
Yeah, but Nintendo has always been super kid friendly. If you look at it that way, its really well done. It does a good job at protecting kids from inane shit. 
Most excellent point.
I freaked out about seeing [Choda Boy](http://www.comicbookmovie.com/images/users/uploads/8558/choda-boy-m_7e7fec1d6c7d473e997141b35aaf9519.jpg)  At Primus last time they played the Wiltern...
Stomp it out with a newspaper.
Check out my New Year's article from Time Square New York.
I don't think ideology is really the problem. It's more structural, the realities and necessities of power. Ideology serves only as rationale, justification, rhetorical cover as people who seek power, or seek to hold on to it, implement policies that are of benefit to the rich, influential, the powerful - those who can help the attain power or hold on to it - but that achieve results that are exactly the opposite of what their purported ideology aimed for.  Liberals and progressives hate libertarianism because Republicans specialize in using it as rhetorical cover, while implementing corporatist BS. Yet the problem isn't with Libertarianism per se - the same can be done with Socialism. See e.g. USSR and Maoist China. This is the lesson of Animal Farm. Those who are convinced capitalism/free market ideology are the problem should do well to understand, Socialism too is prone to being hijacked and coopted, and used to do great evil.  So maybe the thing to do is not fight at the ideology level, but try to improve people's understanding of the political system. It flabbergasts me that so many otherwise intelligent progressives are absolutely convinced that if they cast a vote for Ron Paul, they'll magically morph into heartless greedy libertarians, or the American Ruling Class will somehow turn more libertarian in economic ideology, or something.  They remind me of Christian fundie nutters who are convinced that if we stop mass-murdering Arabs, or funding Israel, next thing you know we'll be under occupation by Islamic Caliphate troops who will impose Sharia on us.  System runs on hate and loathing - liberals and progressives need to be made to understand that this shit works just as well on them, as it does on RedState Rural Redneck Cons.
&gt; I'd live in Northern California once but leave before it made me soft.  As someone from the east coast who currently lives in northern California I laughed. I've heard this before, and it's true. Very true. I'm due to move back to New England sometime in the next few years.
i wish i could have gone my whole life without knowing this. but now that i know i will make sure i inform as many of my friends as possible.
It's mindblowing.  In the same vein, consider the theory that there are an infinite number of universes; this means that if you were to imagine any sequence of events happening that are physically possible, no matter how long or complex, there is a universe where that has happened. Like the joke, *there is a universe where you dated Megan Fox, dumped her to marry Emma Watson, and then had a threesome with [insert hottest woman here]."*
Tell your law-breaking friends!
there is a great show tonight at the blue lamp. 3 bands and burlesque in between. Pine box boys are headlining. Look them up.
1. Move out of my parents house  2. Go to vacations in several other countries  3. Play in some major poker tournaments 4. Talk to a shrink 5.  Buy a mighty fine music equipment and buy all my music
Can I ask you what program you use to stream? and if you do anything extra to make BF3 stream?  I can't seem to get it to work, the streaming works fine, but when i go to BF3, all you can see on the stream is black.
fuck ME the world is bigger than it seemed yesterday
It may be internet censorship ... but the reasoning *is* pretty solid :P  Doesn't the united arab emirates block all sorts of sites? I didn't see people crying in r/atheism about it then?  Just wanted to point out that you're pissed about them blocking this subreddit rather than internet censorship. "Internet censorship" is just a hot phrase being used as a segway in this case.  Tl;dr: atheists can be just as petty as theists. Where is the "who the fuck cares? get off my main page!" religion?
[Relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=B5-Ds8SkX7A)
Well, eggs aren't vegan.  So no, you wouldn't be a vegan, but it's a convenient shorthand for when you're in restaurants.  Your chickens are probably not near the top of my list of things to be extraordinarily worried about, but I'm not going to say it's okay either.  (I don't think the eggs or the chickens belong to you, but "vegan" and "humane" aren't necessarily the same goal)
Holy cow.  I found out how to win the steam contest.  *Just buy every single person's wishlist down to 9 so that they have &lt;10 games come Jan 2nd.*  It can't be more than the value of the grand prize.  &gt;_&gt;
I guess I'm too nervous to do the asking. Fear of rejection and all... haha
windex doesn't do anything that hot water wont do.  Ammonia will react with anionic salts to produce ammonium chlorides. NH4Cl is highly soluble in water so the use of windex may increase solubility but it is not necessary.  I use Hoppes 9. 
These are my husband's food groups, sweet and salty. His cholesterol is bad, but not the way you'd think. Because he's got Crohn's Disease and is missing half his large and a third of his small intestine food goes through him like shit through a goose, so to speak. He takes handfuls of Colestid pills to slow down his gut. This further reduces his cholesterol. Last time he had it checked his total cholesterol was 17.   If I ate his diet, I'd be dead in a year. 
It's not as easy as that. If someone opened the "Star Wars Cafe", clearly catering to Star Wars fans, that would be blatant trademark infringement despite being a different industry.
This is totally normal. Think of it like mood swings, except they're orientation swings. Go with it and enjoy all your attractions as they happen.
Bill's Place is a good wednesday spot. They do 1/4lb cheeseburgers for $1.75 all day, and after 9pm all liquor is half price!
When I have chest congestion, that thick, mucusy stuff that you cough up, I like to play with and chew on it in my mouth for a while before swallowing it.
So if I enjoy Haggis, does that make me a Scotsman, even though I have never even been to Scotland?
I'll talk to my dad when he gets home and see what we can do. If anything, I'd like to have a partner to go on walks with :)  Ninjaedit: If we can take him in I can comp you the price + his stuff.
MMOhut.  I was getting burned out on DotA, but wanted something similar. Got a beta invite from an old DotA buddy.
Because when they fuck with our internets they fuck with our meat and fuck that.
It's cool, they have FMG9s to play with now.
Pm me, I'm going out tonight
I'm actually in the same boat right now.  
&gt;So he's lying now or the NYTimes is.  Yeah, lying. It is not possible to have different views of what happened. BTW, why is Obama public about his reservations and why did he do the signing statements?   
Even though I am an atheist, [/r/atheism](/r/atheism) is perhaps one of the shittiest subreddits around.   The only reason I'm still subbed is because it on occasion has something decent as the top post. 
"people you may know" will become "people who may have done your girl" 
I've been pleased with my [SP10](http://www.amazon.com/Bayou-Classic-SP10-High-Pressure-Outdoor/dp/B000291GBQ/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1325376021&amp;sr=8-1).
...  *Nahhhh!*
He admits he has **serious reservations** and *still signs it*. What a push-over.
... ... ... [8.5]
this would be my problem then
No reelection vote for Obama, this is a game breaker.
SO. BRAVE.
It's okay friend.  Yahoo mail's UI is vastly superior to Gmail atm.  Christ I was saying this to someone and he was like "oh did you try out the new gmail yet" and I thought maybe google improved it somehow yet when I chose to use the newer version, they managed to make it look even worse.
It doesn't matter what he thinks; this is a judicial matter not an executive one. If you are voting for a president soley on the content of their character then ron paul still trumps everyone else regardless of this seemingly backward libertarian view.   Sexual harrasment is a form of discrimination and is protected against under title VII of the civil rights act. Ron Paul can't do a darn thing about this. Also this was written 30 years ago; lets ask him if he and his views haven't evolved since then. I question how politically informed he was at the time he wrote this.  &lt;/end apologizing. Not every speck of dirt is a mountain&gt;
That's the message of the story of Abraham and Isaac, among many others.
Okay guys this is a buy out:  Tomb Raider: Underworld  Terraria  CS:S  CS  Grid  Kommander keen complete pack  I'm talking with someone atm, if you can top this the trade is urs
They heal for too little as his nuke is a lot of damage instantly. Auto-attack harass wont be your problem (in most cases, for this, tangos are great). A salve will do wonders as you can take 2-3 nukes before popping them and get to full hp, this keeps you alive 'til you have your lifetube.
My last math teach was the biggest ass when it came to this.  If you used any other method besides his, even if it was faster of more exact, he wouldn't just  mark it wrong, He'd give you negative points.  So a 3 point question would take 6 points off of your total grade.
Drunken idiots and drug abusers in their own home should have no problems with cops. They won't be bothered there. It's when you do those things in public and disrupt other people. It's easy to not appreciate cops when they give you a speeding ticket, or you hear about one abusing his power. But when I see a cop standing in the rain at an intersection directing traffic, I feel differently.   Getting sloshed at home isn't illegal. Do it in public and you've got a problem, not that I agree it should be a problem. I understand the nature or policing people. I'm huge about minding your own business. But policemen are just doing a job, trying to provide for their families. If you don't like what they are enforcing as a whole, take it up with the government. They are the ones who create laws. 
[This NYT article](http://loyalopposition.blogs.nytimes.com/2011/12/16/beyond-eeny-meeny-miny-moe-sorting-out-the-g-o-p-field/?hp) helped me a lot:   **Michele Bachmann** is the obvious choice for a true Tea Party believer, who wants a candidate to carry the banner of far right contempt for and alienation from Washington. Other candidates try on the Tea Party tri-corn, but it doesn’t fit. Ms. Bachmann is the real deal – and for that reason, I think she has no chance of winning.  **Rick Santorum** is the candidate for a Republican who places a high premium on strongly conservative social positions sincerely held. Mr. Santorum doesn’t just talk about these issues, he’s voted on them repeatedly. He is inflexibly opposed to a woman’s right to make decisions about her reproductive life. He is clearly religious but doesn’t exploit it like like Gov. Rick Perry, who wears his Christianity on his sleeve and across his shirts, like a Nike swoosh. And if you really care about abortion, as in banning it, Mr. Santorum is your guy.  **Rick Perry** is an alternative for voters who are driven by their Christian faith, and don’t mind that he’s going to embarrass them by using their common religion in a comic-opera way. People who miss George W. Bush and want to make that mistake all over again could do a lot worse than Mr. Perry. That also goes for death penalty advocates. Mr. Perry is not reliably rightwing on immigration, but I can’t imagine that he would actually pursue his beliefs on the subject if he got into office. Kind of like Mr. Bush.  **Jon Huntsman** is the obvious choice for more moderate Republicans who like a candidate who can articulate his positions, has experience in international affairs (remember when Republicans actually cared about that?), has governing experience (as governor of Utah) and knows his way around the executive branch. You just have to get over the fact that he seems certain to lose, big.  **Ron Paul** is a no-brainer if you want the candidate who has the most clearly held views and is not afraid to break with orthodoxy (like admitting he’s to the left of President Obama on Iran). You have to be a libertarian, which to me is a really eccentric idea for a governing philosophy. I get what happens on Day 1: You bring the federal government down to Somali proportions. What do you do on Day 2? Step over the homeless and the hungry on your way to a Cato Institute meeting?  **Newt Gingrich** is the front runner if you believe the polls. Personally, I can’t believe even the fringe Republicans who dominate the Iowa caucuses would nominate him. But if you want a bomb-throwing neo-conservative who hates the very idea of a government that helps those who need help, then Mr. Gingrich is the right choice. He is anti-abortion, anti-gay, anti-gun control, anti-judge, anti-almost anything you can name. The catch is that he may well be unelectable beyond the narrow confines of the Republican primary system. His positions, starting with his utter contempt for an independent judiciary, are far too radical. (By the way, his take on Jefferson and the courts last night was not quite historically accurate.) It’s hard to imagine a broad range of Americans tolerating his buffoonish posing as a historian statesman, when really he’s a history influence peddler, or his tendency to compare himself to Reagan, Jefferson, Jackson, Lincoln and Theodore Roosevelt. But, if you’re a true science-fiction fanatic who wouldn’t mind a government shutdown or a few constitutional crises, vote for Mr. Gingrich.   **Mitt Romney**. It’s hard to characterize the kind of Republican voter who should choose Mr. Romney, because we have no clue what he actually believes. If you’re opposed to health care reform, and are troubled by the fact that he was a pioneer in that area, you can be comforted by the fact that whatever he believes, he will probably govern from the quasi-conservative positions he’s been taking lately. He seems like the most electable of the group right now, mostly because he’s the least terrifying to people who are not committed right-wingers. He could, theoretically, pose the greatest threat to Mr. Obama.
amazing!!! we need to see more :)
I'm sorry to tell you this, but Chair doesn't love you. Chair loves Lamp.
Amen. Good to remember this in very good times as well as very bad ones. 
No, it'll turn into chaos with hundreds of splintered Ops and suggestions that wither and die under neglect.
op is always a candy-ass
I will be glad to explain or address any questions you may have :)
You'd be surprised. We have grocery outlets here, I don't think they're usually expired but a lot of the expiry dates on "non-perishables" (canned goods, etc.) are way earlier than when the food actually goes bad. There's a lot of good stuff there that's perfectly fine, I've never bought anything that was 'bad'. But then, I don't buy there exclusively either because in some cases it's more expensive than going to our local grocery store because you can't really get what you need, just a bunch of wildcard items. It's great for personal care products, too. I go there on a whim sometimes. :D
I'm fine with the way it is now. Children can pray in public school, if it's done silently and not teacher-led. That's the way it should be, in my opinion.  It's the only fair way to do it in a secular nation full of people of different religions as well as atheists.   If you're OK with teacher-led prayer in public schools, is that only because you assume it's going to be Christian? Or would you be bothered if it was a teacher-led Muslim prayer? Or Hindu prayer? Or Wiccan?  Granted, in private schools, children can pray out loud and have it be teacher-led. So, if you want your kid to be able to experience teacher-led prayer, send them to private school...  As it stands now, no one is barring kids from praying silently in class, to themselves. I think that's the way it should be.
...in ocean on an organic spaceship flying through the universe with all the other talking monkeys.
Koreans still butthurt about not getting a free ride?
Don't you mean oh g-d why?
Having "tactics and teamwork" occur on a 128-player server is completely different from having a 32v32 competitive match. I played a ton of PR, I loved it, but it is an entirely different ball game. 64v64 PR is like doing military re-enactments. 8v8 BF3 is like playing a football game.
[James Blake - "I Never Learnt to Share"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DSvb_jGwQ7s)
I believe there is one. r/howithappened or something like that. 
The post is wrong and misleading, however. It is not applicable to virtually everybody on the site. AAA is only doing this in a handful of states in the USA, most of those states are sparsely populated. They are by no means a majority of the population of the US. Further, USian readers are not the entirety of reddit. 
This is madness. 
2nd this. 40 Gallon is a wonderful size.
Good! That's been my discovery; usually I don't have any regrets about dropping people who make me feel bad about myself.
Also I managed to recreate your obsidian generator and i'm having trouble duplicating the lava? How'd you do it? just threw the switch as fast as you can or slowly..?
Well, Batmoisés, I keep trying to think of a question that hasn't already been posed, and I keep drawing a blank.  Except, perhaps, to ask you whether there's somewhere I can sign up to be kept in the loop?  Have a happy new year, and good luck with decontaminating (and subsequently improving upon) the mess left behind by Ocean Marketting/Stratagy. :)  And remember: wwebsite as on the internet!
More stuff to do there? Haven't been that way yet. 
I had some of those last night, the dark chocolate ones are disgusting.
So this is located... In B4. *In before blah blah blah?*
Meanwhile, GEOCEPTION is at 100+. Go figure...
I'm not saying he is.  I'm simply trying to point out that even if he hated this thing in its entirety, he was still powerless to stop it.  I personally believe him when he said he was opposed to large swaths of this bill.  The cynic in me thinks this because he knows that even if he wins in 2012, the Dems are likely to lose in 2016 and then there'll be a Republican of unknown character sitting on the power he was just given.
I don't have LA Noire sorry
I think it's better that it was deleted lol so funny, the possibilities are endless
YES; AND YOUR ONLY SALVATION IS **THE ONLY** THE DR: RON PAUL!!!
 I know that. here's an analogy say you are trying to boil some water but you keep adding ice or more water to it your going to need more heat to be able rise that water to its boiling point of 212 °F. So i guess what I should have said that my body needs to increases its energy output to maintain my temperature. 
only if you beat him after doing a good amount of stuff first. for example my first play through i was lvl 16 when i fought him the last time and he was definitely the hardest dragon i had fought so far. second play through i was like lvl 34 when i fought him and killed him with like 4 arrow.
I disagree. I never inform an officer of anything unless I am legally required to or it would put my safety or his in danger.
[/r/circlejerk](/r/circlejerk) exists for a reason. Can't things like this go there instead?
Downvoted.  Stop telling us what to like.
one of the very few perks of the job I'm afraid
if you can't beat em, confuse em...=]
Korea is not a direct threat to Israel.
Not me but this guy at my old church in my youth group was caught by my youth pastor having sex with a random non church going girl behind the church one day. The youth pastor talked to him about it and the dude had the balls to keep coming back to church and all other meetings like bible study and act like nothing ever happened and then ask out my little sister. Oh **HELL NO**. Few people knew about it despite it being a small church. This was back when my parents dragged me to church, which obviously was a great experience. (*sarcasm*)
Calgarians we have turned into lemmings whats going on!
Stupid.  Stop posting forever.
Hot teacher sits on desk and wild fantasy about teacher begins just like in porn videos
fixed: Can't
You're not alone, brother.  http://imgur.com/Za00r
Please encourage other foreign redditors to petition your public figures to speak. Remember our government does not represent us and we need help.
And if we had Bynum in for either of those games, Odom would have been a nonfactor.  Doesn't matter though, because Bynum came back now and Odom ain't never.
Theres like 20 different "elo hell" threads each with completely different advice and everyone saying how that particular advice worked so well for them.   The best advice is to just fucking play ranked instead of asking ambiguous crap on reddit. You will inevitably rise assuming you are as good as you think you are. 
Aww yeah :D
&gt;that's about the same as when people think of someone who is gay, they think of an effeminate, limp-wristed, lisping waif who is obsessed with fashion, decorating, and has AIDS.  To be fair, Richard Dawkins, [Christopher Hitchens, Bill Maher, and Penn Jillette](http://i.crackedcdn.com/phpimages/article/9/1/0/107910.jpg?v=1) actually do exist, and *do* shout from the heavens their antitheism, while the limp wristed flamboyant gay guy doesn't exist, *or* go around shouting he's gay.  And you mistake me. I'm not saying all know-it-all cockbags are atheists, or that all atheists are know-it-all cockbags. I'm saying that the *most vocal* atheists are know-it-all cockbags, and that's why people don't like atheists. It has little to do with their disbelief, and more to do with their expression of it. Or am I wrong in assuming the top comment on [/r/atheism](/r/atheism) is a meme bashing [Christianity](http://i.imgur.com/GppnW.jpg)?
You stopped?
Will check that out thanks!
&gt;Moreover, I want to clarify that my Administration will not authorize the indefinite military detention without trial of American citizens. Indeed, I believe that doing so would break with our most important traditions and values as a Nation.
Yeah I didn't dismiss anybody  so I'm not sure where that came from but I guess we're cool
Sleeves are really long. If you're okay with a coat fitting like a blazer (nothing wrong with this) get sleeves shortened, should be shorter than body length. Ideally showing a little shirt cuff when moving. Bottoms are its own thing. Don't pair together. 
Not useful if they need to read most than the most recent ten chapters.
I want to attend or at the very least watch the video cause this looks to be a party to remember forever!
&gt;Really? Merriam-Websters dictionary is what you filter theological ideas through?  I don't have any theological ideas seeing that I don't believe in theology (being an atheist and all).  However, when I need to debate the definition or meaning of a word, I find Merriam Webster a good source to reference.  If you'll look closely, there are three definitions given for magic.  I'm referring to definition 2. &gt;2 a : an extraordinary power or influence seemingly from a supernatural source  I find this an adequate definition of how christians describe the powers of Yahweh.  Not a strawman.  As for the zombie bit, if you were intellectually honest you'd admit that the 'full likeness' claim is the ONLY thing your argument has going for it.  
If you are mad as hell at this come read it in a few days.  right now go read about signing statements and the NDAA starting from 2001
I hope it comes earlier rather than later, and with as little violence as possible. But I doubt our overlords will walk out of their buildings willingly and without struggle. 
did you get it all cleaned up already? The stock looks AMAZING. 
franzia, the big box.
Well, we're kind of exiting the season for deals, afaik, so you probably want to buy soon. If you want to copy-paste your newegg cart into a post I can tell you if anything's likely to get significantly cheaper soon, though.
This is my biggest gripe with most people I've talked to. "Ron Paul isn't good" OK then who do you support "They're all the same" &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Can you elaborate on why you think this? 
Thank you, sir. But nothing can take back that lack of forethought. 
But don't get cocky, **ITS FOR THIS TIME ONLY!**
In other words gamblers could be replaced by apes.
hey! thanks for the offer :D this is one of the better ones I've got (regarding the games I wanted).. I was thinking of trading my Dota 2 and something else for Oblivion GOTY, Portal 2 &amp; Risen. I will DEFINITELY keep your offer in mind though! Thank yyyyou.
Then he needs to stand the fuck up and scream about how shitty it is. He needs to grow some fucking balls and tell the American people that Congress is fucking them. He needs to be blunt and forceful. No namby pamby political rhetoric. 
I will simply start choosing what I want to care about, for instance, dirtbags? Screw that! Wikis? Awesome sauce! Etc, etc
Nope, hadn't considered it.
Arch Linux on both my HTPC and my main laptop. It's the bees knees. 
Mmmmm.  Nachos with some Shuttershock.  My favorite.
so you enjoyed the movie, i take it
3 coals and deal
I don't see any need to improve it.
Furthermore, who needs bathrooms? Why can't we just poop in the street? Amirite?
I was wondering the same thing, I live outside of Charlotte, and signed up to help with his campaign, and still haven't heard back.  Maybe he's skipping us? More likely, the campaign doesn't have enough cash to mass-produce products for sale, unlike the other candidates.
Wait wait. Harry Potter was crap?
Well, I'm sorry that you had a rough time in Algebra 1.  I teach Algebra 1, Precalculus, and AP Calculus.  If you had been my student We would have done much better than Cs. The mention of the GRE is interesting.  Let's say for example you had your own method to solve equations.  Let's say your brain could deduce a close estimate to the right answer and just started plugging in numbers until you got the correct one.  The problem with this, and the heart of the matter here, is that "Hooray you got the Algebra 1 type problem right."  Now you move on to the more complicated problems and Uh oh!  Its a three variable system.  All of a sudden plugging in numbers doesn't work anymore.  You may still solve the problem, and you may not. Some of what you mention dyslexia, getting marks off for using the wrong words (not really sure what you meant by that), discalculia, etc are things that must be attacked on an individual level. Lastly, while I believe learning the most appropriate method is awesome for high school level, it starts to lose a little bit of its importance in college, where creativity in math is often rewarded. 
Here is his inventory [CLICK HERE](http://steamcommunity.com/id/Grimzo/inventory/)
Should be top comment. This is mostly what goes on here.  The dissonance tends to come from when people argue over what is "reasoning" or "statistics" or "examples."
I agree with the remakes for games that didn't necessarily sell well the first time. ICO+Shadow of the Colossus comes to mind. They didn't sell well despite being such incredible games.   A lot of them are cash grabs though.
The student has become the teacher.
Okay now I get what you were saying. I guess I have never really messed around with a larger quantity of tobacco smoke 
I fail to see how "Both of these  Acts would retain and create jobs for IBEW members."   These canned support letters make me think that Congress sends out mass emails   To: &lt;Group: Political Allies&gt; Subject: New Bill Needs Your Support Body: Hey guys need a favor from you (again). I am writing this bill up and it would look nice to have a wide swath of industries supporting the bill. Just use the template below on your letterhead and we will post as evidence it is a good bill. If you want to know about the bill go ahead a read it (hahahaha just kidding!), it's called the 'STOP ONLINE PIRACY ACT' nuff said.  Dear Lamar, [INSERT YOUR COMPANY HERE] wholeheartedly supports these bills wholeheartedly because we like America and hate rouge job stealing pirates. This bill will be great for [INSERT YOUR INDUSTRY HERE], because we create jobs while other counties and also internet nerds are stealing them. Sincerely, [YOUR NAME, YOUR TITLE, YOUR COMPANY]
Well props to you for being such a good mamma cat! What does she look like now?
I'm so so so sorry, don't know what I was thinking. http://steamcommunity.com/id/Grimzo/inventory/
I like to imagine that was less trolling and more satire. But on Reddit, where commonly upvoted viewpoints would elicit incredulous reactions in most other places, I suppose concentrating that attitude for comedic effect would certainly come off as trolling.
There's no such thing. Good sex is what feels good to you and your partner and makes you both feel happy and comfortable. For some people, this is porn-like sex; for some, it's something totally different.  Comparing your IRL sex to porn is a lot like refusing to date any woman who doesn't look like Carmen Electra: unrealistic, exhausting, and ultimately unfulfilling.
not bad.
I am extremely curious to know if there are actually dudes in the world who think that a time when two dudes have their dicks out is the perfect time to chat.
No one else finds it interesting that the sole survivor on the football field is "Ward" - as in Burt Ward, the original Robin...?
It's like Charlie and the Chocolate Factory!
No problem, you deserve it.
I love seeing a spider suplex...
Thank you! I honestly don't have much faith in the samples -- I registered for a bunch before he was even born and I have yet to see any of them. Hopefully these will work, though!
And your fiction about the Muslim cult just make you think it's about "dem terrorists!", but you don't seem to get that cults don't equal terrorists. Islam is just a cult created by a loon with a thing for porking little children. 
well i think you only need to look at examples of poor countries becoming socialist. Lets take Cuba first. It was a dirt poor banana island in the 50s. Today the population has a life expactancy longer than America. There's loads of things wrong with it but i think that it is pretty open and shut that they all stem from the US' terrorist war and blockade of the island.  In Venezuela poverty has halved in ten years, illiteracy has been wiped out, there are 50% more people voting in elections than before, malnourishment has been banished forever etc.   There's a common idea that what was called 'socialism' in Eastern Europe failed. Well, it was a pale imitation of socialism but that's a whole other argument. I grew up in one of those countries and i can tell you that under socialism we went from the 3rd world to the 2nd world. Since 1989 the vast majority of the people have gone right back to the 3rd world again. Sure, GDP might look better but that is simply because we monetized everything, such as the right to not die or the right to go to school.   At the heart of your question is what constitutes being 'poor'. I really don't think there are any poor countries left- maybe 200-300 years ago there were. Let me explain; I imagine Africa and Asia were your ideas of 'poor places'. But this idea really doesn't hold up to much scrutiny. Bangladesh was the richest society in the world before it was conquered by the British. Robert Clive couldn't believe the wealth which adorned the cities, gold dripping from wall to wall. Democratic Republic of the Congo has about the lowest standards of living in the world. And yet it may have more natural resources than any other. It is teeming with minerals and metals. Where's the money going? Into Dutch oil companies, Scandanavian electronic corporations and US rubber companies. In fact, the countries which 'should' be poorest, those with the least amount of resources, are the richest (western europe). There are no poor countries, only poor people.   What I'm saying is if big corporations were kicked out, these countries would be richer than the US and the UK were in the 20s and 30s. There are really only rich or mega-rich countries now, but, because of capitalism, the majority of the world still lives in poverty. So, in answer, the people would be much better off under socialism.
...Where the fuck do you live to have 0% taxes?  Because I kind of want to live there.
Ecco The Dolphin is one of the most terrifying games in existence.  
the opiate blocker is helping me stay sober   i didnt use bupe to taper down, i white knuckled it
Probably would have been better without the last frame.
Shadowgrounds Survivor for 4 coal.
Sneak into the stadium. I did it 2 times during the spring semester of my senior year. Its incredible to stand on the field at night and see 100,000 empty seats.
False. No matter how stoned you are, a stop sign will never turn green.
my champagne flute
Flawless timing. Thank you.
Saw it twice and loved it
Came in here expecting a Billy Idol reference.
I'd have to mount it, but it's no problem. I can do that after dinner. I'm looking for $90, or trades.
His facial expression annoys the bejeeezus outta me.
I have to admit a weakness for formalwear undone.  A tux with the bow tie untied, for example.  But in terms of actual people, not in movies?  Jeans and a witty t-shirt seems to work really well for me.
I think you're getting mixed up between kosher food and kosher-for-Passover food.
Yeah, they laughed at the Weiner girl too...
Boxed wine.  It's the same level of class as anything you'd eat at McDonalds.  Don't waste nice wine on crap food.
Reeking
The paradoxes of the presidency.  It's amazing how relevant that sentence is.
It has really high value for the hardcore moba players that basically grew up just playing DotA.  Just check r/gameswap. I got mine from there.
"I'm poopin' in mah cave"
I am misreading this or are you saying that sexism is okay as long as it's an accident and you don't really hate women?  That's ridiculous. It's even scarier to me that people are can and do perpetuate sexism without even trying.
That's not all. If you watch the new video on 2girls1cup you are automatically entered into the xbl new years giveaway!
"Ever since I was a kid I been dreaming about this" : beating 6-7 UCLA
But they are still what $30 when they came out and they have a shorter campaign and no MP?
With these suggested foregrip changes, guns with high horizontal recoil will be unusable in close quarters (this includes g36c, g53, A-91, qbz-95b, f2000, famas, aek-971, kh2002) no matter what you attach into them other than a crap bipod. And attaching a bipod to carbines listed above is just retarded since it takes 7 bullets to kill on longer ranges (something that I'd never understand). Even if you tried to attach a heavy barrel next to foregrip to these carbines, you'll just have to resort to your pistol in CQB as an engineer which shouldn't be happening.  Alan Kertz will kill any run&amp;gun play there is on close quarters with these changes and everybody will have to use low horizontal recoil weapons if they want to do so like m416, m16, m4 with either a suppressor or laser without foregrip.   Suggested changes will basically make everyone start using the same weapons without foregrips or bipod then he'll come back here and bitch about everyone using the same 3-4 weapons as Assault and Engineer and not attaching a bipod or foregrip. He'll probably keep continuing by nerfing those since they'll all be overused by then.  Making foregrip reduce horizontal recoil by 0.1 deg on all weapons gotta be the worst idea this guy ever suggested. My bet is that it'll be in the next patch since he's basically screwing the game over and over again every patch.
But Matt Damon is the messiah.
Well done. I got it when I was going through my blues phase in high school. Still everyone I know's favorite guitar when they see it.
**SWEET BERRY WINE!**
How would that work? Wanna be friends? :)
Morgan Freeman
Or he creates smoke screens that answer shit. If his intention was to cement everyones opinion that he is indeed a douche, well mission accomplished
dota2 will blow lol out
We love operating with couples who see that we've a exclusive vision for marriage ceremony photography and who are looking for wedding ceremony photographers who will provide them with a one of a kind knowledge.
"And then those two groups by race" - Berkeley.
RTFA
What, if her dad suddenly started manipulating reality like conjuring magic missiles, that would be 100% indicative of god's existence?  Even if he claims his magical powers come from god, historically most sorcerers were patrons of some god - Ba'al, Ra, etc. For example, just because Melisandre can see the future in flames does not mean that R'holler exists.   
Yea man, the hangover (dehydration) combined with no food and getting high (super low blood sugar and pressure) and boom you go down. It's how I learned the munchies are there to protect you.
Plenty of awesome new stuff, I downvoted because I like CN now much more than I liked it when I was a kid!
No.  My Dad could easily watch some Rocko's Modern Life, or Powerpuff Girls or Samurai Jack or Spongebob and laugh/enjoy himself. Sometimes, things really do get shittier. Currently, Cartoon Network has been barely scraping by by having 1-2 watchable shows during any given season.
MIND = BLOWN &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
It's almost like there are differences between men and women or something.
It's sad that your OP is getting down voted because people only believe what they want to believe. Even when presented with the facts, they've already made up their minds that any fact you present that is a counter point to their preconceived notions is fiction. 
Beats Hazard for 10? :D
Zapp.
Has anybody actually used this program?  I'm going to be in Adams-Morgan tonight -- I'm more worried about finding a cab than actually having to pay for one.
THANK YOU 
Thanks. Most of the disks look brand new too, so i'm happy.
Just upgrade.  I'm sure it's *possible* but if I remember correctly, quite hard and definitely way more hassle than it's worth and you're pretty liable to just break the thing.
Highest Base Movespeed: Luna (330), Chaos Knight (325), Anti-Mage (320), Naga Siren (320)  Lowest Base Movespeed: Techies (270), Crystal Maiden (280), Invoker (280)  Lowest BAT: Anti-Mage (1.45), Terrorblade (1.5), Windrunner (1.5)  Lowest Armor: Doombringer (0)  Lowest Attack Point (front-swing): Io (0.15), Sniper (0.17), Gyro (0.2)  Lowest Sight range (Day): Night Stalker (1200)
i can offer 3 coal. http://steamcommunity.com/id/imeatinbutter
Actually that Scully dude looked pretty good.  I realize he missed a FG, but it was 49 yards and it was close...and he was WAAAYYY better on kickoffs then whoever else was doing that all year.
&gt;When Apple kills the Mac by folding it into iOS, I'll be done with them.   You and me both. I'm very concerned about the directions they seem to be going.   Lion drives me crazy. I want a phone that acts like a computer, not a computer that acts like a phone. 
 &gt; Why does that automatically make them attention-seeking [loud, outgoing type]  Because any man who lacks those qualities won't put on a dress. 
I'm learning how to havee lucid dreams just for this reason, Only on reddit can I find people just like me
Just to be clear, if I'm doing *insert exercise that is not squats here* in the squat rack, and the proper equipment is in use (hence my use of the squat rack), you can kindly wait your turn, or work between my sets.
I have no idea why some women do that. I really have no idea why they think I want to hear about that shit either.  Personally, I think it is tacky to discuss something as private as my sex life with other people. I figure that if my husband, or any of my ex-boyfriends for that matter, wanted all of my friends to know all about the size and shape of his dick he'd show it to them or describe it to them himself.  
I would probably think batman would win even if I was christian, just that Jesus wouldn't lose.
We have burger king too btw
hunting and stalking is ok
Want Left 4 Dead GOTY for 10 coal?
Presidents in Iran only handle domestic affairs and even then the grand ayatollah has the final say.
god damn count me in. The first time i did it, i went for say 12 days or so idk, but everything in my life improved. right now im at the lowest of the low... life sucks right now. Im hoping this will bring me out of the hole im in.
i don't think anyone who fears god has a gaping asshole.... just sayin...
I'm sorry if I'm doing this wrong, I never really post on Reddit, but I think I'll try to help.  If you're having trouble getting in good games, play with friends - preferably with ones that aren't retarded. I makes things a lot funner, and a lot more "tactical".  As for getting used to the gun play, I'd stick with Support or Medic - I'd stick with Medic, though. It's the simplest role, in my opinion. Get kills, and STICK with your team mates. Try your hardest to play with a Support guy.  And please, please, don't play Recon. Unless your got more than 5 hours, don't try Recon. I can't stand useless Recons. Waste of space unless you're good.
Maybe in the next one I'll have a [pretty close-up.](http://cdn.steampowered.com/v/gfx/apps/39800/ss_c0411e75f8b4a1669e746965697627227ee4a333.1920x1080.jpg?t=1319735273)
Classic hand rolled joint
Free samples for all the boys!!!!
They definitely notice. It's just an awkward thing to bring to someone's attention. I'm not trying to be a dick but there's absolutely no way you don't smell gross after not showing for a few days.
make a top lane tips please &lt;3
ill do it http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198016646065
That fucking Jersey-Shore has been the bane of our existence. Sigh, you have no idea sir. 
In fairness, you'll have a pretty hard time hacking my PowerBook 145B that I only use as a portable serial terminal.
How much would it actually cost to do something like this?
Thank you.  You backed up my argument far better than I did.  Very well said.  
if I could fuck rocks without getting splinters of rock in my penis I would1
the "best" would be people you see with well behaved dogs.   as far as heath and well being a Vet is best. a Good vet, there are some who are just paying the bills.  there really isn't anyway to prepare for the training part until you get the dog and figure out what works for them.  my last dog was motivated by treats, my current dog couldn't care less if there is a food reward, she will behave if i give her a look of disapproval.  trial and error for the method.   Consistency is key
Everyone in Samoa will sleep for an entire day.
[/r/athiesm](/r/athiesm) laughs because to them, everything is a joke. 
I enjoyed the Destiny series. It encompasses bits from ENT, TNG, DS9, and Voy (a bit). If you like the Borg, you will probably like this series.
It's hypnotic.
There should be a subreddit for this. I hate scouring [/r/graffiti](/r/graffiti) for the contest posts. And maybe flair for first, second, and third (Like medals or something)
Bitch.... (brother with only a smart phone...)
I don't even have booze right now:/
What's the matter, she stole your sweet roll?
It really depends on what country you live in. A lot of the European countries have professional leagues that have specific seasons during each year. In the US, if women are still in school they can play in the NCAA league. While other countries are sometimes centralized in a specific city, or play for club leagues during the year. However, most teams come together to centralize a few months before major competitions (World Championships, Olympics, etc...)
http://imgur.com/5oEBH
I think in order to do that I think you need to give it to your friend so he/she can use the survey. I haven't used the Dota 2 thing yet.
His beard finally ran off with him. He managed too keep the beast in check up until now. It went and took Socke to do some otherworldly manly things we StarCraft II nerds can only dream about. When he returns he will become #1 on EU, NA and KR and win at least 4 GSL's next year.
Gaaah how I hate SOPA and Protect IP &gt;.&gt; The whole point of the internet is to be free, not censored in the name of stopping piracy! Besides, looking it over I doubt it will do more than temporarily slow it down. Piracy is a problem, so find ways to fix it, not destroy the internet &gt;.&gt;
I just read it three times now. Is there actually a misspelled word, or am I being trolled? ;_;
Join the party; 2nd beer in.
Best part of working at Arby's back in the day: having a heated drawer full of thick-cut pepper bacon at your knees.
I pictured Waka Flocka saying that...
From what I see of rift, they have lots of end game content, and some of the hardest fights in any MMO.
What solution is it? If there's an MSDS available, I might be able to say if they are in OSHA violation.
Oh good!
Surely they didn't eat shit. 
Moving from North Carolina to Los Angeles!
I've seen this complaint posted before. Downvote.
Is it pirated?
Lots of video game items (my main shop theme) plus a few year end clearance items like my old line of soaps, and some supplies too!
Hi, I really appreciated your post, you obviously are very knowledgeable about your field(obviously, if you've got a PhD, you've put a lot of work into it, so I just want you to know it's clear you're a very intelligent and, while I haven't personally contracted your services, I am going to make the assumption that you are very thorough). I have a few questions, I do have a few mental health issues, but they aren't rare at all, and the diagnosis has been confirmed by numerous mental health professionals(multiple psychiatrists, all of whom evaluated me over a 60minute period, a psychologist, a social worker with a doctorate in social work, and some regular social workers, as well as a pediatric neurologist when I was 17(I'm 19 now, going to be 20 on Jan 21st, and this neurologist is one who is quite well known in the medical community). Basically, I've just got run of the mill depression, panic disorder, as well as sleep disturbances due to a very rare genetic condition I have called Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, which causes me extreme chronic pain, I have seen palliative care physicians, neurologists, physiatrists(not the same as a psychiatrist), and pain management physicians(anesthesiologists or physiatrists who have completed an extensive fellowship post residency in pain medicine), neurosurgeons, orthopedic surgeons, and of course a few internists, all of whom have confirmed the diagnosis. The level of pain I experience is what causes my depression for the most part(though, I have developed thought patterns as a result of my pain which can trigger a depressive episode, I am working with my psychologist to learn coping skills and the like).   Basically, the pain I have prevents me from doing several of my favorite things, things that you wouldn't even think would be influenced by pain, like simply going over to friends houses to sit around and play video games, walking up stairs, going to the store, but the most serious issue is the effect this disorder has had on my academic performance. It isn't that I lack intelligence or motivation(though at times my motivation is low), but my ability to attend classes is at times non-existent. For example, my last year of high school(I graduated in 2010) I missed at least two days every week, I still graduated in the top 25% of my class, and graduated with honors, but since high school my pain has become much more severe and has spread to areas I wouldn't have ever expected it to spread to(Ehlers-Danlos is a connective tissue disease that results in frequent joint dislocations, tendon/ligament injuries, etc), the most serious pain I have now is abdominal pain and incredibly severe back pain(I have a syrinx in my spinal cord, you'd understand what it is if you look it up, if you don't already, it is usually caused by a chiari malformation, which I don't really have).  The thing I've written this all for is to give you some understanding of the challenges I face in everyday life. But, I have big dreams, I'd actually like to be either a neuropsychologist or a neuroscientist, those fields of study are just endlessly interesting to me, and I love studying them. But, due in part to my depression, and pain, I often have very severe anxiety over one area of my academic abilities. You see, when I was in 1st grade, I was diagnosed with a mathematics learning disability(the testing was done by a school psychologist and took around 5-6 hours, I had to redo this testing every couple of years, all of the testing took 5-6 hours and also tested other areas of my intelligence to see if I had any learning disabilities there). During school, I was in a special ed class to help with my math(but in a regular math class, the special ed class gave me access to teachers who could help me understand it, and communicate to my math teachers my issues and make changes so that I could succeed, I'm sure you understand the special education system). However, I've never really gotten any solid evidence provided to me about my disorder itself, nor have I learned much about it, I don't even know the name of the disorder. I'm curious if a neuropsychological evaluation could possibly help me to get more information about exactly what is the source of the disability, I mean, I know there is no magic pill to help with learning disabilities, but I'm just wondering if a neuropsych could help me in anyway at all, if I could do some testing to just learn maybe WHY I have the disability(as in, what IS my disability, I can understand medical and psychological information with ease, I've considered going into medicine even). The reason I want to learn as much about my disability as possible is because I realize that my inability to really do math will be extremely deleterious to my ability to succeed in any graduate program for neuropsychology, psychology, or medical school due to the amount of complex statistics classes which often contain elements of calculus, as well it will most likely prevent me from even completing premedical requirements since there is a great deal of math required, including calculus. Therefore, I often feel defeated before I've really begun to get into serious classes that would pave the way for a future as a clinician, medical doctor, or academic, and that sense of defeat causes me a lot of anxiety and depression. TL;DR- Is there even the slightest chance that a neuropsych evaluation could help me understand my disability so that perhaps I could go about learning methods to overcome my weaknesses.  NOTE: I realize that the internet is not the most appropriate place to ask these questions, but I've never really met a neuropsychologist to ask them personally, and I'd hate to waste both their time and my time with something that has no chance of helping in anyway whatsoever. I am not asking for medical or psychological advice, as I know that since you cannot evaluate me personally, it'd be a legal liability on your part.   If you feel more comfortable answering this question in a private message, or have more specific questions to ask me, please feel free to send them in a private message. I am extremely grateful for any attention you give to this post.  Regards,   -Nick W.
On Halo, those fucking bastards.
Everyone single one of them is sleazy and self centered. Their only agenda is their own and it's just a circus for show. The only person who represents me is me.   For some time now Politics has become about money and buzz words and this worries me. Once upon a time it was all about representing people and doing whats best. Not anymore!
I normally just say random obscenities to them in a kind voice. I've told a couple of them that I would kill and eat them in baby talk before. No point in antagonizing them and they only really understand tone so it entertains me.
[](/derpyhappy "I love getting Mail")The pure ecstasy of seeing that letter in Derpy's mouth turn Orangered and hearing her say that particular line is almost... [ooorrgaaaasssmiiiccc](http://www.newgrounds.com/portal/view/178546)....
I think your violin might be better than mine. /jealous  Good work, though it's not good for you or your posture to stand with your knees locked like that. That might have a lot to do with being slumped. Also, the interest in the piece will double automatically for your audience if you showed you were excited about it. I'm sure you are, but as it is we can't tell.
Looking to purchase the px4 subcompact .40 in a few days as my second purchase and carry pistol. 
BAD ASS!
I disagree.  But, really, it doesn't matter. 
Thankfully someone had the guts to blog about the horrible injustice that cop suffered.  Fuck this story.  They fail to mention it is a safer place cafe for the community and he was in there with a gun and other weapons.  Good on the staff for looking out for the customers, apparently they've attracted more people to the store because of this move.
10 kills with killstreaks disabled, you can get it in drop zone.
This question isn't "can we afford to do so."  We couldn't afford the last 2 wars but that didn't stop us.  No.  The answer is, they have no natural resources.  If the U.S. government was really concerned with spreading democracy we would have invaded and liberated saudi Arabia from their oppressive dictatorship.  But it just so happens that the dictators in Saudi Arabia are cozy with the U.S. military so no need to liberate them.
Ugh, another complaint about reposts. What's with all the anti-repost reposts? /s  Seriously though, some people haven't seen the same posts as everyone else. 
does puffitup.com honor the warranty? Because they do sell it for 120 but they add extras. I think i might order it from there.
This is actually really well done. I've seen some terrible Seven of Nines at cons. People think the costume is simple, but it's actually really tricky to do it right. Good work on the darts in that fabric and Extra Super Bonus for pulling it off without a corset. Ms. Ryan always wore one under her suit. I'm the first to call bullshit on girls who post just for attn. This actually shows a lot of creativity and dedication, so good work! (btw, I'm a hetero girl, so save it, snarkies)
I've only posted a couple of these to r/itookapicture before and I wanted to share the rest of my favorites but I've been forgetful in uploading them.   So here they are, all at once in an album so I don't end up spamming this subreddit. Cheers, to a new year.
I'm a n00b myself, but one of the first steps is to know the difference between baking soda and baking powder and to own packets of both. Also, buy yourself some pans.
I've been told American-type fast food restaurants are becoming more popular in France by French friends. I'm curious has the increase in obesity paralleled the increase in availability and popularity of these sorts of places / foods. Is anyone charting this?
http://www.reddit.com/r/adventuretime/comments/nu7ra/lucky_find/c3c0h25
[](/lunateehee"I have no idea")Amazing what Google can turn up.
Mine was rather similar to yours.  A very small sudden injury to my thumb.  Tore a small piece out of the middle of the thumb nail, leaving jagged shards of nail in the wound.  Extremely painful, but so small I thought I could just shrug it off.  I tried shaking my hand - big mistake.  Then I tried running cold water over it - another mistake.  Then I tried ignoring it.  Next thing I knew I was on the floor and my friends were picking me up.  I had gone completely unconscious, face first, down to the cement floor, but fortunately my face was saved because I was close enough to the wall to hit my forehead into that first.  Left a good sized hole in the drywall, and cut my forehead a bit, but that was really nothing, compared to the pain in my thumb.  I had always heard about how bamboo under the fingernails was a terrible torture, now I think I know what it feels like.  Only thing I wonder now, is how they keep the victim awake long enough to question them.
Seriously, if this grows at the same rate Minecraft did it'd be insanely awesome. Hell, i would probably get more enjoyment out of just messing around with the level maker for a year or so.
Red.  Fucking.  Pill.
That's funny, I specifically remember him pledging not to issue signing statements during his campaign... http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=seAR1S1Mjkc
Question- Is there any chance that you'll be okay? Like if you make it through this year can you make 5 years or 20 years?
i fucked yo daughter whil she was on my pill
sent a friend request
pm or add me on steam please
His personal quirks don't bother me. A Few Good Men was good work. Jerry Maguire was enjoyable. FX is running Tropic Thunder right now. First time I saw it I didn't even recognize Cruise.   If you want an enjoyable read, and some hint of where Cruise, Lowe, Swayze, Estevez, etc came from check this out....  http://www.vanityfair.com/hollywood/features/2011/05/rob-lowe-201105
This should go on doctor who subreddit.
Phimosis, i.e., it hurts.
I tend to C4 them nowdays, RPGing them is just takes too long, and if there is a gunner in the thing, you'll be lucky to get off a second one.
Yeah, my husband has ruined quite a few of my favorite items.  We have a pretty good system now.  Anything that requires special handling goes in a separate hamper that only I manage.  Anything that ends up in the general dirty laundry hamper is fair game.  You can't be too mad - it's sweet that he did laundry for you.  
I can offer 7 coal (it's all I have left), The Ship complete, Half-Life 2, Cogs, Shadowgrounds: Survivor, and 5 keys  for it if it's tradeable.
My wife is watching a movie, I am watching Dexter.  We chat the whole time.  We are sitting three feet apart, and got a little bit of liquor.
Neither am I. I'd stuff her stocking
Sorry meant to reply to op, not to this comment, but oh well :)
&gt; supplement the money I make playing water polo  How do you make money playing water polo? How much can one make generally?
I remember him showing this in the streams about a year ago. Gotta love the streams.
[They are REDUCING their support](http://www.destructoid.com/ea-nintendo-sony-reduce-sopa-support-by-50--218742.phtml)
Alright, I'm going to be the one to ask, how do you read this? Or am I just missing the joke?
KA-MOTHAFUCKIN-BOOM
I was mentally preparing my self to see what was going to be dead, NOPE! dog in sand 
Want Left 4 Dead GOTY?
Morgan Freeman
Thank you much.
[*I CUT UP PIECES OF SALAMI***AND PUT THEM IN MY PEEHOLE**](//#clarinetkid)
Sorry to hear about your beard, but [Male Group Therapy is this way](http://www.reddit.com/r/MaleGroupTherapy). No one here cares. 
So...should I just walk into an ER and say I'm going to kill myself?  Is there a better way to get help?
Assault: M16A3 with the suppressor, underslung rail, and M320 or M16A4 with holo, grip, and silencer.  Engineer M4 or G-36 holo, grip, suppressor.  Support M240 Extended mags, grip or MG36 holo, grip, suppressor  recon Mk.11 8X scope, ACOG, or holo, foregrip, suppressor.  Shotgun 870MCS or M1014  PDW P90 suppressor, laser sight   Pistol M1911 suppressed or G18 supressed
Looking through windows for demons, and watching the young advance all electric.
Saying a country has a small population as a reason why their policies won't work here is just being intellectually lazy.  Yeah, some things might not work, but it doesn't make it so for every social program. For example, single payer health insurance is superior in every single way over our current for-profit health insurance.  Insurance works better over the largest pool of people.  So having everyone on single payer is better than having huge gaps in insurance coverage.  But, I am betting by your ugh is that you are already completely closed minded about this.  But prove me wrong...it would be a nice shock.
8888 anti-anti-whites
you were hooking up with your boss? please continue
This is good news.  I've heard from multiple people in the industry that she's a bitch.  I refuse to believe that because it seems as if she'd be a sweetheart.  Maybe they caught her on a bad day.  
In fact any reservation that he supposedly claims is a straight out lie, unless his reservation is that it doesn't go far enough to give him the authority to imprison american citizens without due process.
last set of Q and A 1.  the forums are made specifically from people that used excessive and will give me answers my dr will not its a very simple logic to my actions although I have no clue the relevancy that has to to the subject or topic at hand but there is your answer.  2. I used to run a socom clan on the original socom called TheAngryPeople a bunch of ringers from all the best players would come and play I was the leader and my name was theangrypimp , i carried that tag with me everywhere until XBL told me to change it then i changed it to TheAngryDude its not really relevant at all its just a gamer tag. 3. No comment on that subject  4.We met at CES last year 
Since no one has mentioned this, I'd like to throw this in:  Depends on how you define the terms "smart" and "smarter".  Also, the dinosaurs had very small brains with huge bodies and that didn't seem to affect too much their "body map" and/or enteric functions. I personally think that intelligence can be of different varieties like vision can be of different varieties (night vision/ sonic vision/ regular vision for example). Each type of intelligence may have its own priorities, so we may not be comparing apples to apples here. Things that are important to us and therefore "smart" maybe just downright retarded for whales (not to imply anything here either way btw) or another type of intelligence.
What features does it have that the Android reddit apps lack?  Or is it just the fluidity of it?  I'm using Reddit News primarily but I still go back to RiF for better subreddit access/searching and some inbox access.  Reddit News is almost there and I'm hopeful the dev keeps it up.
You should look into r/fitness for advice on getting in shape.  Starting Strength is always a good program if you're new to weight lifting routines.
shit had me worried i know dre's one son is gone
THAT'S YOUR PEP PEP. 
It's not the reason, it's the fact that people get into arguments and don't know how or have the willingness to work it out.
This is a daily occurrence and I provoke it. Don't you worry, I can handle these pussies.
THIS IS STILL AN INCREDIBLE DEAL ALRIGHT
Always stole my brothers' (I had three) Legos and made what was on the boxes, then made my own stuff. 
Aww, you holiday themed your spam.  Fuck off.
GET OUT OF MY HEAD!!
Oh, goodness. I'm so sorry! That sounds horrible.
Dubai is an Emirate of UAE...  he may also be referring to Dubai city inside of the Emirate.  Either way he is in UAE.
It's shit like this that makes me feel going F2P was a terrible mistake because of the damage done to TF2's community. Don't get me wrong, there are definitely a lot of great F2P players, but I can't help but feel bitter that all of my favourite servers are now clogged with 13 year old attention whores.  (Yes I can mute them, but I bloody well shouldn't have to and as we've seen they spam the chat as well.)
I haven't been able to find it since I moved, sad days.
The voice of reason always gets downvoted. But who wouldn't want to hear what they're up to? Hopefully this doesn't happen to the OP.
I am aware of this word you call patriarchy. Are you aware of another word, called misandry?   This exact scenario happened to my roommate. His girlfriend got drunk, beat the shit out of him, finally he holds her against the wall to make her stop hitting him, and she calls the cops on him. Guess what happened? Nothing. Because he was fucking defending himself, and there were witnesses. What do you suppose happens when it's her word against his, and she has marks and he doesn't?
next week's dinner
Maybe not, I got 1...2...3...kick it! for one coal yesterday.
'My administration will not authorize the indefinite military detention without trial of American citizens, *we'll always be sure to have them put to death in finite time*'  (— "indefinite" means the law doesn't restrict it, but his state says the administration won't hold someone for an unrestricted time, well duh— the laws of the physical universe appear to prevent really unbounded detention, somehow this isn't much of a consolation unless _reasonable_ limits are applied, which is what both the law and obama's statement have failed to do)
[your cat](http://i6.photobucket.com/albums/y232/LLSamSam/Gif%20Folder/tumblr_liad8fCg8W1qi8oc5o1_500.gif)
How do you get PvE gear?  Only PvE gear I've got during a week of lvl50 are "epic" item mods for daily tokens on Ilum (you can earn around 20 tokens daily, hilts/barrels/armor mods cost 8 tokens apiece). Gear is similar to lowest level PvP sets you can find on fleet pvp vendor (centurion?) Daily PvE quests on Ilum require hours of time if solo - NPCs are tougher than on other planets.  How do you get PVP gear? (And highend PVP gear)  2 daily PvP quests (win 3 warzones + flip 5 points on Ilum) provide 1 champion bag each. 2 weekly quests (win 9 warzones + flip 15 points on Ilum) gives 3 bags each. Drop rate from the bags is around 1:3 / 1:4 (some people reporting 32 bags without single item drop) - so in my opinion it doesn't worth time to farm 800 warzone commendations to get a bag with semi-useless 3 tokens.  Where are the daily quest hubs?  I've found dailies on Ilum and Belsavis (there are lvl50 parts of map on 41-43 Belsavis, you will be sent to there by a quest giver on Imperial fleet). I suspect there are dailies on Corellia but I didn't finished "secondary" quest line there yet.
[](/priceless) I thought you of all people would enjoy this!
Ok, I actually read the bill and I don't see ANYthing wrong with it. Here is the main portion of the bill:  &gt; (a) IN GENERAL- That the President is authorized to use all necessary and appropriate force against those nations, organizations, or persons he determines planned, authorized, committed, or aided the terrorist attacks that occurred on September 11, 2001, or harbored such organizations or persons, in order to prevent any future acts of international terrorism against the United States by such nations, organizations or persons.  So the bill authorizes self defense against people who planned, authorized, committed, or aided the 9/11 attack, in order to prevent more in the future.  Sounds like a good bill to me. No "sweeping" powers here.
THIS IS WHAT CHRISTIANS ACTUALLY BELIEVE.
If you already bought it then overlook the cons and give it a chance. Just take care of it and you should be okay :3
The text not in bold are Ron Paul's own words unedited.  Ron Paul - Bill of rights http://www.lewrockwell.com/paul/paul259.html  *If anything, the Supreme Court should have refused to hear the Kelo case on the grounds that the 5th amendment does not apply to states. If constitutional purists hope to maintain credibility, we must reject the phony incorporation doctrine in all cases — not only when it serves our interests. The issue in the Kelo case is the legality of the eminent domain action under Connecticut law, not federal law. Congress can and should act to prevent the federal government from seizing private property, but the fight against local eminent domain actions must take place at the local level. The people of New London, Connecticut could start by removing from office the local officials who created the problem in the first place.* **Ron Paul lying about the Constitution**  The Founding Fathers envisioned a robustly Christian yet religiously tolerant America, with churches serving as vital institutions that would eclipse the state in importance. Throughout our nation's history, **churches have done what no government can ever do, namely teach morality and civility. Moral and civil individuals are largely governed by their own sense of right and wrong, and hence have little need for external government. This is the real reason the collectivist Left hates religion: Churches as institutions compete with the state for the people's allegiance, and many devout people put their faith in God before their faith in the state. Knowing this, the secularists wage an ongoing war against religion, chipping away bit by bit at our nation's Christian heritage. Christmas itself may soon be a casualty of that war.  "The notion of a rigid separation between church and state has no basis in either the text of the Constitution or the writings of our Founding Fathers. On the contrary, our Founders' political views were strongly informed by their religious beliefs. Certainly the drafters of the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution, both replete with references to God, would be aghast at the federal government's hostility to religion."  **Ron Paul on sexual harassment**  "Employee rights are said to be valid when employers pressure employees into sexual activity," Paul wrote. "Why don't they quit once the so-called harassment starts? Obviously the morals of the harasser cannot be defended, **but how can the harassee escape some responsibility for the problem? Seeking protection under civil rights legislation is hardly acceptable."  **Ron Paul - We the people act**  The We the People Act forbids federal courts, including the Supreme Court, from adjudicating cases concerning State laws and polices relating to religious liberties or "privacy,"* including cases involving sexual practices, sexual orientation or reproduction. The We the People Act also protects the traditional definition of marriage from judicial activism by ensuring the Supreme Court cannot abuse the equal protection clause to redefine marriage. In order to hold Federal judges accountable for abusing their powers, the act also provides that a judge who violates the act's limitations on judicial power shall either be impeached by Congress or removed by the President, according to rules established by the Congress.
This has been removed. Please use a reliable host as stated in the sidebar.
I'm surprised with all the negative rep and boycotting they haven't invested in improving that. While saying that, BF3 payment was the only hassle I had, and neither me or my roommate have had problems with either BF3 or SWTOR, despite thinking we might have.
Being positive here is a brave feat. Upvoted for courage. :)
I always wanted Charlie to die on L O S T
Me too. me too...
3
Both of the random tag matches he's been in have been fucking great. Last one was just poetry in motion, and this one was hilarious.  this being TNA, however, I'm sure my joy is fleeting.
The Cartoon Nework guy makes me think of "Tom Goes to the Mayor", and that makes me wonder who Tim and Eric sucked off to get their jobs.
reveilark up kiki-jiki pestermite.  &lt;3 reveilark
32bit or 64bit Windows 7? If I recall correctly, Snow Leopard drivers don't work with 64bit W7. If you can find the Lion drivers they might work.  If it's 32bit W7, then the problem is something else.
No! I like mine dehydrated and solid as a rock. It retains the taste but smells much better and has a really nice texture! The only issue is that depending on the power of the microwave and skill of the cook it can take ages and come out awful.  For example, I put mine in for 1 minute bursts and leave the door open for a few seconds to let the water vapour out. 5 of these and it's perfect in mine, but 5 minutes at once and it comes out quite disgusting - not flaccid like, but the fat is all mangled and horrible, just nasty, all of it.  I am very adamant when it comes to my bacon, if you serve me crap bacon I will refuse to eat it, which is something that only beef shares that honor with.  Edit: HAPPY NEW YEAR IT'S 00:00GMT! WHOOO I'm pissed as a pancake, so forgive my poor explanation of my bacon preferences and reasoning behind it, I wish you all the best.
I actually already own both (solid games), thanks for the offer though.
in fact all small camps are 1 min
The first one got taken down and I finally came upon the remake today.  Figured since it's my cake day AND new years eve it was more than appropriate.  Stay safe and freaky tonight everyone!  
LOL. Let me see that one too so I can decide as well!
Again: why did he first defend the articles if they are so contrary to his principles?
I received one. The handle metal is of cheap quality, and the blade isn't as sharp as the website leads you to believe.  When I received mine I also had to apply copious amounts of oil to get the handles loosened up for play.  Get a kimura.
Do you think the republicans would have not funded defense if Obama refused to sign the bill with these crap provisions? He could have easily gotten around this and the fact that he didn't even try is disgusting and pathetic that he tries to blame others when he does sign it. Hope and change? Or more of the same?
Uh, I think the idea is to spread the word to everyone to make them aware of the policies of the UAE.
How have I not heard of banana milk?
It wasn't. There are a ton of broken nodes in Nar Shaddaa.
Yup, you're definitely hot. Wouldn't mind more pictures. ;)
It's somewhat ironic that you rage about reposts, and then follow that up with a repost of our perhaps most frequently asked question.  So the answer is: people who are new, such as yourself obviously, haven't seen all the existing content (they'd have to spend months browsing the archive to get just a glimpse) and so to some people it's all new.  Two solutions for you personally:  * don't read the reposts * post new content of your own.
I finished it recently as well and can't wait for the movie next year. Very enjoyable show with very plausible science.
Wow. You are correct. Last mindblow of 2011.
That the forgiveness of sins is silly because of atheist views but a magical titan stealing fire from the land of the gods and giving it to mortals who would clearly never figure out how to start fire on their own seems reasonable and useful.  It's complete suspension of disbelief for one scenario and not the other.
Agreed
haha, you guys are terrible.
Reminds me of the first adult joke I ever heard and was confused by. I was peeking through my mom's door as she watched that guy, Goddfried-something? Scratchy-Voice-of-the-*Aladdin*-Parrot Man.  The joke was that he was fooling around with some girl and she told him to stick a finger in her. It grossed him out, but he did. Then she asked for two fingers, then the whole hand. The other hand. Up to the elbows, and then to his shoulders -- then she looked down at him and said, "Tight, huh?"
LUNCH MONEY, PUNK
Great video! Thank you for sharing. 
Voyager is definitely worth a second chance, i got my co-worker to promise to watch it all the way through as long as i promised to watch DS9 all the way through, needless to say we were both very surprised at how good they got (i never got past season 2 of DS9 and he never got past season 2 of Voyager).
get too drunk to remember what year it will be the next day
...what?
that is actually a potato fish.
I'm still considering it if all games can be traded through normal steam trading.  If you're still up for it and think it is fair, Doom Pack Complete, Greed Corp, and Fallout GOTY?   [Plus, any interest in coupons here?](http://steamcommunity.com/id/pimpybra/inventory/)  Or that other Storm: Frontline Nation game for some other trading?
That guy had the most random collection of stuff to destroy, watched to the end just to see what he would pull out next.
Well that is positive!!!
It's...*sniff*...beautiful. Thank you for your hard work and happy new year.
i've said it before and i'll say it again, butler is way better than they get credit for
Happy new year you beautiful bastard!
It looks like these are arms already purchased by the pentagon as it is a government to government deal. This would mean that the pentagon already purchased the arms and is reselling them. The profits would go to the government.
Brutananadilewski.   ^ my first achievement of the year.
Got a PAX sivir code at PAX and decided to try the game out.
That shark looks like it's been through fucking hell.
Sigh, I haven't played in a year and I have no idea what that cartoon is about...
Seriously though. I can almost understand the age of the Earth thing because the evidence is beyond casual comprehension, but the "Jesus said no violence," thing is pretty simple and obvious.
Even if a person is a terrorist, he is still a human being and deserves the right of due process!
If theres is still room left, ill join to. Been a long time since ive last played.
Thanks alot that's what I wanted to know :)
When I was looking for an RPG game for myself a few months back, Magicka was suggested by a redditor. I had tried it then, but didn't seem to enjoy it in the one hour I played it.  It is not something my friends would like. They are not fans of fantasy/rpg play. 
"Life is hard, but you have to keep trying" -me LOL I'M SO INSPIRATIONAL!! :D
Agreeing to disagree is fine by me. Still, congratulations!
funny, out of the 1400 people at my school, everyone i've talked to says they don't play it :/. me are sad solo qing.
We have a Gabriel Bell running around Seattle. One of the first protest permits for the Occupy Seattle Movement: [Article]http://www.nwcn.com/home/?fId=132108388&amp;fPath=/news/local&amp;fDomain=10212  "The Westlake permit was prepared for and signed by Occupy Seattle protest organizer named Gabriel Bell. The City Hall Plaza permit was signed by an organizer named Brian Williams."
What are three things that put a smile on your face every time?
and both us trading via gift (risky) this person is legit :)
We grill it wrapped in prosciutto.
That's just gay. 
Trapped. Lonely, but mostly trapped.
I merely wanted his opinion on it.  No need to be nasty.
Casting anything other brings it down, so there's still some practicality there. 
The moniker "no fun city" as some commenters have mentioned already refers mainly to our strict bylaws with concern to alcohol. The stifling effect it has on our cultural night-life is ever-present.   Of course there is tons of fun to be had here, just not as much as there could be if a lighter hand was present from the city.
wtf, 14 downvotes ;[
[Nice vinyl collection](http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/35m6fm/)
Don't do it. Don't do it. DON"T FUCKING DO IT. 
This guy is using both arms to hold the TV. Who took the picture?
Just had the same experience.  My razor came with a Merkur and almost 30 blades later, I still love the Merkurs...
He posted about it way back when development first started, so I got in then. When news broke that Baconreader is going to be developed by OneLouder (the people that make FriendCaster and TweetCaster), I know that thegloriousday (Reddionic dev) got pumped cause he knew he'd have to compete with a development team now.
If anyone is interested that duo of mushrooms 3 rows down are Campestri,  an *Advanced* Dungeons and Dragons monster from the Volume One Monstrous Compendium Annual /nerdsnort
Reminded me of "one titty's bigger than the other so I call her Biggie Smalls"
Binding of Isaac, would be nice Indy game night to enjoy.  http://steamcommunity.com/id/lionsi
How is it any more able to sustain its life after birth.  It is still a parachute till 18 and beyond.  Should a mom be legally required to feed the baby after birth?
I like MAD. ;-;
I wasn't sure if troll or not, but reading your comment history (apparently, both dogs and cats are "Satan's pets from hell") made me sure that you're either a troll or crazy. Either way, LOL!  "Do not listen to this lawyer. The correct course of action is to pray to our True Lord and Savior, Jesus Christ Almighty, Holy Warrior and Master of all. "   LOL
Wait, so the celebs are "awesome" just for being nice to other human beings?
I think I remember Fabricant making something fitting for this.
Ontario engineering student here: ~$6000 per *term*.
You ever heard of fucking movie ratings? That's what they are for so you can decide what is appropriate for your kids. But I'm just gonna assume you're a troll and not a total retard.
Youll die first come december of next year. Itll be a good warning system
Pretty common if they're comfortable with their own sexuality.   For me though, I can't stand it. It just makes me feel like I have to go to the bathroom. 
How about a Torchlight coupon? http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198044177679/inventory/#753
33 an hour canadian
like I said before.  prior to the early 90's your parents could be of another nationality and you could get an emirate passport.  The girl I know who got one is my age, 30, and has a canadian mother and british father.  I would have loved to have gotten an emirate passport when I was living over there.  Traveling through the region would have been a lot easier.
It's not so much that I have to ask whether or not to get it. I just wondered what the reception would be.
Good point, thanks.
After downing that bottle, are you going to r/Gonewild?
You have a dirty sniper
what are the necessary steps to becoming a massage therapist? would you recommend it? I've got a talent for massaging and I feel like i could use it to fall back on as a job.
2011 made me think life was turning around.  It suggested the concept that I might be able to finally not feel like a shitty waste of life, but then, it said "Fuck that, you don't deserve to be happy!"  And threw everything back in my face. These sentiments of "Fuck 2011" are echoed by me.  A year of false promises and endless strife and bullshit.  I can't wait to put it behind me, and ring in the new year with the best solution to problems I've ever discovered -- alcoholism. I'm at a party, I have a fifth of Russian Standard, and a handle of Pinnacle.  I will be drunk.  So drunk that I won't give any fucks about whatever happens tonight, despite the people here (one of whom was the principle lie of 2011.)  I'll get fucking wasted and wake up to what I can only hope will be a new chance. Fuck you 2011, and 2012, may you bring something better, or the end of the world.  Either are acceptable. Don't like the wall of text?  Fuck you, too.
Wouldest thou what?
*cough* Dual citizenship.
No, people who vocally declare themselves "Atheist" are in the minority; people who's stance on religion is "meh" are the majority.
Bieber's gotta be Darth Vader. 
NOPE, CHUCK TESTA
To be able to get a reaction from people without having to deal with the consequences of telling someone your secrets
The last time the US had a true free market was the era of the robber barons. America was not great during that time. America became great during WWII when the economy was more controlled by the government than at any point in US history.
I'd love for you to take a stab at a logo for a game I'm working on, I'll send you a PM shortly with details!
Some of those are ugly, but some of them are **really** good, especially for a 11-12 year old. :P
[You can be awkward and still win.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3KDRjld7mv8)  Btw, NSFW tag yet?  [His interview with Lisa Ann is absolutely hilarious.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IhZkqUj0hRM&amp;list=PL2DF3673D1DF139A3&amp;index=2&amp;feature=plpp_video)
Getting engaged and graduating with my Master's degree in social work with a 4.0. 
Nope, my sneak is mid-range.
This has been removed because it is being hosted by an unapproved host. More information about approved hosts can be found by clicking on the big FAQ button in the sidebar.
Stop whining and single-handedly take them all on :P
[Here's mine](http://steamcommunity.com/id/darkflame75)   It's the best form of communication for me too. If you add me and you have a pony avatar or you tell me you're adding me, I'll probably accept.
invest in headphones, never hear anything again. 
Seems kind of high-minded to assume you know what God is thinking. I think any being capable of creating a universe is probably a bit more morally evolved than to say, "Oh, he doesn't like me? To hell with him!"  Telling a person that their individual path to spiritual enlightenment is wrong causes stagnation of our culture and condemns mankind to a slow, lonesome death.
Paul Newman was a super cool guy too. When asked if he ever cheated on his wife he said, "why eat a burger when I've got steak at home." his food company donates profits to charity and he supported civil rights.
but isn't a vote for just about any of the cookie cutter politicians just a vote for more of the same..more of the same...  Loss of rights Defense spending gone mad  where are the politicians campaigning to stop this insanity?
Stfu stupid ass
That is my point, actually. Nobody's really tried to come up with a better way. 
I'm with you. I do my best to avoid killing any insect and understand that awareness is relative, but to project the idea of prolonged abuse, pain, or agony occurring in such simple organisms is a bit impudent in my opinion. 
i have about 30 of these that i collected from the bar i work at. i intend to make something like this someday. awesome work mom!!
&gt;The one lesson we need to learn from all of this is that our government is DEEPLY in bed with corporate interests...  For the sake of discussion, allow me to disagree with you. I think a better lesson is that politicians can not understand the implications of what they do, nor be informed enough about every person in the country, let alone the world, to plan their lives for them.  Their excuse is that they are trying to "save" jobs. If they really were looking out for every American they would be trying to get as much information as possible from the people that would have the most / best information on the subject.  It is entirely possible that they are doing exactly that and it isn't so much that they are "in bed with corporate interests", but that what we are seeing is the side effect of entrusting them with an impossible task.  On the extreme, lets not worry so much about who is getting to decide which books go into the bon fire and start making it clear that we are against book burning.
I had this happen to me a lot in high school. Got pissed off every time. 
Welcome to adulthood, Son.
I wonder how many Philistine farmers were just minding their fields, when they suddenly got ganked?  RPG, OT Style.  Saul has given you a quest:  Quest: Collect 200 Philistine Foreskins. Reward: Son-In-Law, his daughter Michal in Marriage  Reviews:  "2 Stars. Killing soldiers with the jaw of an ass is a lot of fun when you play the Samson level. But the grinding can be brutal at time. Killing 200 philistines, and removing their foreskins? I could have done without the harvesting animations. The gamedevs must have one sick sense of humor.  Also, with the Red Cross now saying military FPS games should seek to minimize civilian casualties, or at least discuss the issue of warcrimes, they will have a field day with this game. The Amelkhite campaign is especially nasty. Upset you can't kill kids in Skyrim or Fallout 3? Well, no problem here. The only ones you can't kill are the female virgins.  I know this game is based on a famous book, but wow, just wow. And they have the gall to complain about "Postal 2" or "Skyrim""
Fus Ro Da
Bingo.  Super fucked up
depends on the particulars of the TSA agent...
If you've got the resources, there are therapies that can slow down early puberty. I believe they use FSH? I'd do some research on it.  I think I read about it in a recent Time or Scientific American. Not sure. Sorry. 
No digital camera, sorry. I guess it really comes down to this.  If your integrated GPU is shot, will a discrete Video Card still work well enough without drivers to at least get SOMETHING to your monitor? If yes, I probably have a DoA. If no, then my computer is boned and it leaves me baffled as to how I switched the cards out once before.
Easily my fastest .gif check yet.
because I am going to make it a positive interview
This is really tough to watch.
Why not fire up a virtual machine with Wheezy and give it a go?
okay, I will let you know if anything changes. Thanks for posting the offer!
Write him in.
You got me there. Imma h4ck4r allright. Yep.
Normally, the approach there is to encourage the student to ask questions and do your best to answer them in a way that builds understanding. How well this can be managed with 30+ students in each class is another matter.
Didn't you see American Psycho?  Sociopaths (and psychopaths while we're at it) are handsome, charming, intelligent, and very coherent, even when they say things like:  &gt;*Well, don't just stare at it, eat it!*  &gt;*That's a very fine chardonnay you're drinking. I want you to clean your vagina.*  &gt;*You're a fucking ugly bitch. I want to stab you to death, and then play around with your blood.*  But still..
The police department in my city used to issue the PX4 in .40 up until a couple years ago. They changed them out for the .40 M&amp;P and haven't looked back. I'm unsure what issues they had with the PX4, but they're apparently much happier with the M&amp;P.
Ah shit. First thing I post that actually gets a good amount of upvotes turns out to be a repost &gt;.&lt;
Because it seems more likely that you like the film because everyone else does, rather than for it's own merit.  Fight club is one of my favorite films. My girlfriend (at the time) said "It would be mine too, if it wasn't so popular."  Stupid bitch.
[](/joy "OH GOD THE 'BEETUS")
&gt; What the fuck has bailouts got to do with the poor.   Everything. It was money given to banks that is to be paid for by taxpayers. It was a huge ripoff of the American public. I'm surprised you are not aware of this connection, it was screamed about all over the internet since 2008.
There is no inoculation from human nature.  We'll make messes.  As long as we are willing to clean up the messes we make, we are a shining example for how to govern.  not by infallibility, but the willingness to take responsibility.  Dollar = upvote?  I am against.
Of course.  And their coming to get  your guns and put you in the FEMA camps for your gay indoctrination.  Just stay home and wait for the van.
Looks like a double street lamp or something.
I may regret this....  THE WELL.  It's a great, fantastic bar at Sunset and Argyle.  Please let it stay a secret, please let it stay a secret, please let it stay a secret...
that's what it's telling me
fallout 3 made up for the dice by giving the community tools to create. Which ended up ripping out the dice.
&gt;When men can become impregnated, carry a baby to term, and give birth - we may have reproductive equality. Until then, biological differences make true equality absolutely impossible.  All I'm asking is you this to stay consistent. I'm fine with men having no reproductive rights **under this one circumstance:** which is, if the child is her's because it's in her body, then it's her's after birth as well. If a father feels like ditching the kid, it's now his right because it didn't come from his body, and until men can give birth, they don't need to take responsibility for kids.   Again, I'm only advocating this to keep it logically consistent. If the man has no right to tell a woman what to do with her body, then she has no right to hold him accountable for what happened in her body.  If we're all in control of our bodies and only our bodies, then women can't force men to take care of their children. If you don't agree with this, then tell me how you're being logically consistent. That is, how can you apply the logic to women, but not to men. 
I think it would be pretty awkward to win without donating.
Have you seen the multiple legal experts, both civil and military who say that you're wrong and that the bill could easily be interpreted in a much broader fashion than you suggest?
My teacher made a comment on how the beer on my shirt was his favorite one at the bar.
Why didn't you play the christian women have to obey men card?  And if you've alread been in her holy of holies, it's not like she would have had a choice. It's either marriage or a stoning.
I have a super fast metabolism and I've been struggling with it lately, tell them you used to eat 5 times a day and lately you just haven't been eating enough due to life circumstances(stress, no time, someone in the family is sick). It's the closest you can let the truth out without actually disclosing the real problem.   It's hard to be politically correct in this situation because some people just might be commenting on wanting you to look healthier and better and you can't fault them for that since they don't know your issue, so you won't want to be a bitch but you don't want to disclose the truth.
It sounds like the graphics driver is crashing in windows, and then when it resumes only partially running.  Have you re installed the graphics drivers? that usually solves the crashing issue
Check the @Battlefield twitter account.  They're normally good with saying when the servers are down...It happens more than it should.(I'm also on xbox)
Squeeze out whatever you have in mid-squeeze, stand up, turn the faucet on really loud, sit back down, commence shit.
I liked your recaps, they did a good job of recapping the action.   I would recommend making a tappedout account or at least fixing the spacing to improving readability.   How often do you run into color screw?
I'll give 5 coals! http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561197999337231/
Because the two sound similar aloud causing some people to think "would of" is how it is written. Pretty common mistake.
That's quite a deluded viewpoint in that case. Most of the people that I've seen post on this site are so incredibly stupid that it pains me to even click on the "comments" anymore. 
Ours are both pretty mellow... about 80% of the time.
I wish I could say I did... But I found it on one of those meme-creator websites.  The shame. ;_;
Philosophy by definition is the study and critique of the fundamentals of subjects, so if we have progress in other subjects, we have progress in philosophy. 
[This](http://a4.sphotos.ak.fbcdn.net/hphotos-ak-ash4/382586_952752254809_12800553_40958988_1618502233_n.jpg) isn't from the night that I DJed and is also a terrible photo, but there you go. A combined taco and dinosaur costume :P
It really sucks when that starts to happen
I must break you.  I'm actually trying to lose weight. I used to be 320. It's a slow progress, but I'm getting there. I could never lose 100, but I'd be happy to shed 60 more.
Witty.
The *Holy* Bible  ohohohohohohoho
&gt;The scariest thing I've ever eaten  FTFY  
Way too many. Maybe 25% of those with objectives.
How about coupons? http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198044177679/inventory/#753
Asexuality isn't just black and white, like lots of things. Asexual, except when it comes to fantasies, where you are bisexual? I think you fit in the "Grey-A" category. http://www.asexuality.org/wiki/index.php?title=Grey-A
Taxi #'s A-C Taxi: 777-7777 or 526-4888. Your driver might be a redditor who gives deals to other redditors. Or take your chances with sketchy old yeller 544-4444.
What's left over when someone smokes a heater.
I have tons of coupons, please check out: http://steamcommunity.com/id/vertoc/inventory/  I would also be willing to buy a few games for you (maybe)
driver sf
What? No.
This has been removed because it is being hosted by an unapproved host. More information about approved hosts can be found by clicking on the big FAQ button in the sidebar.
&gt;I meant the argument we were having here. I'm just not sure what your standpoint is, or what it is you're trying to say.  I've been pretty clear about it.  &gt;I'm going to have to admit that your style of writing, and how you reference things, is fairly confusing to me, and I have lost my train of thought.  OK. This is normally where I would ask if I am using too many syllables but plenty of people seem to think that is rude.  &gt;I don't know what we're talking about any more. I'd love to talk to you on this subject again sometime; maybe then I'll be able to follow along better. Sorry about this.   It's still all available up above. Not as though one couldn't read it and at least a few people had no issue understanding it.
You replies to the wrong person. :)
4chan/somethingawful
Said it once before but it bears repeating.  Broke my boyfriend's penis. I'll preface this with saying he was my first sexual partner. It was my first time on top, and I was bouncing hard, like they show on porn. Unfortunately, he wasn't that big. He slipped out, I heard a crack as I bounced back down HARD. I hit him so hard, my pelvis connected with his, regardless of his penis being in the way. He screamed and threw me off of him, beginning to cry. I didn't know a penis could make that sort of snapping noise. Long story short, his penis turned black and purple. It bends the other way now. We got married this September. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Penisfraktur_01.jpg Pretty much what it looked like. Warning, NSFL. I'd also like to mention that I did attempt to give him a blowjob while he was healing, instead of having sex (THAT was interesting).
there are a lot of sticky rules to being an actual corporation, and if you don't follow all of them to the T, then in court you will be ruled as a sole prop, and lose all of the protections you thought you had as an LLC. You can't just file LLC (or S or C or any other corp) and say 'I am safe'. If you are doing enough business that your personal assets are at risk, then seek the advice of a lawyer, and not the professionals on reddit.
played college football, and is a big dude that has to push other big dudes around. :p
Sequel to the Giving Tree - Shel Silverstein
That brawl in Detroit?  I was there, but I didn't get punched. When shit started to go down, I shouted, "RONALD, NO!"  Remember that?
Signing statement was a symbolic stand. And it will get used in the supreme court hearing on the issue.
I'm glad you were able to come out without anything physical happening to you. Actually, my relationship before this one was exactly like that. He had guns, and he would break shit, but he knew to never lay a finger on me. I've unfortunately ended up with two bad boyfriends back to back (but a great history before them which gives me hope), so I am going to take some time for myself, friends, and family, and give dating a rest due to the trauma over the last couple of years. It saddens me since I am very a bright woman who usually makes good life choices, but these two guys hid it from everyone else in their lives. it shows it can happen to anyone.
Honestly, that's probably a good way to go about it. Lucky you having a small enough school to have a class with her! Just try it, and try to be chill about it. Just say hey, and chat for a while. Don't let yourself worry too much about the fact that she's a pretty girl. She's just like everyone else, so make her feel like that.  And sorry if I made you feel like a little kid! I bet you are very mature for your age, but trust me when I say this, I'm 20 now, and I was mature for my age when I was 14 too, and you still change a LOT. So don't worry about it :)
Glad to hear it!
https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/bytubed-bulk-youtube-video-dow/  Have you tried this, it is for FF4+.
Why, oh why, didn't I take the [blue](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zYddmPbu7jg) pill
One theory is that pica is caused by a deficiency in vitamins/minerals/nutrients. What type of food do you normally eat? Do you take a daily multivitamin? Have to had bloodwork done to check for anemia (which can be related to iron deficiency)?
Socially awkward penguin viewer? I think I already have that app, it's called reddit.
It's nice to know that I'm not the only person out there that enjoys cold showers!
This is exactly it.  Modern, internet atheists have turned into what they hate the most.  And it's embarrassing really.
A guy named Butt_munch69 lives with his parents? Who'd have guessed?
I was mostly wondering how long it had been since Algebra 1 for you.   I dunno about the 'grading people down for being bad at english' bit though. I remember Algebra 1 as something like an introduction to proofs/number theory/fields more than anything else. Using the right words is half the point of learning proofs, and learning proofs is why Algebra 1 is a not-very-enforced pre-req. 
What kind of depraved fucked up shit do you do to get your asshole that loose
*but war... war never changes.*
Thank you! Best reply so far :)
That sir is a lovely bread. Props.
microsoft has 25% of the number of consoles in the hands of consumers that nintendo does...  sony has 54% of the number of consoles in the hands of consumers that nintendo does...  Who exactly isn't being competitive?  --edit: source --  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_best-selling_game_consoles
I'll be surprised if it gets that crazy again but who knows.
From the video: &gt;Danny, you are a disgrace to my group, I do not want to be associated with you
Reddit likes grammar more than dogs OR cats.
YOU DID IT!
Ive heard of many famous people getting both life and death masks. What was the purpose of doing this? Was it expensive? 
The aim is to get them to talk about what they are passionate about. People talking about their passion are interesting because the emotion is contagious.  Once you have them talking about what makes them interesting, steer the conversation towards a mutual subject that you are also passionate about.
when were you born there? are your parents americans?
I am? Where?
So you're not sorry you got caught.  Got it.
Air. We'll all be breathing through tubes of liquid nitrogen, flailing around on flapjacks and shooting bubble gum out our noses! 
omfg thanks so much &lt;3333333333333333
Try to find a correlation between thoughts/feelings you may have preceding a binge. For many people (perhaps you, perhaps not) binge eating is an emotional suppression reflex that activates around memories, feelings or trauma that our subconscious wants to avoid. It's very difficult to overcome without guidance, because our subconscious can get what it needs without us really being aware in the moment. Though we become all too aware in the aftermath, when trying to recover from a binge.  If it's at all possible, speak with a psychotherapist.
you should be better than that.  hufflepuff has merits, too!
Thank you. I'm trying to keep my head up, focus on making 2012 a much better year (the first year without him).  We can totally do it! Keep up the good work. I'm proud of you! 
yeah man, shell out that five dollars for me and give me that sense of security that I won't get charged with a 250 dollar fine. after that, I can only assume that we're clearly destined to be together.  
Wow bro, you're so hardcore!!
thanks man, and sorry im new to this subredit.  I just started to read the guide.   added you!
It's neither angry, nor is it nonsense. Though I can see how being filled with righteousness might make it seem that way.   Your mistake is thinking that what you *feel* is right is justified.  You're argument is specious. Not only are you blinded by your own zeal ('terrorists', tyrant') but you are attempting to press your opinion into service as fact. Not only is this incorrect, but it demonstrates a lack of maturity.   "Because I really want it to be so" does not make it so. Not in this country, anyway. 
No they can if you are cheating. Well could... and steam does sometimes screw people but a lot less than EA.
"When I was 18 Steve and I killed a hooker in Mexico"
I've met heroin addicts that use strictly new needles, micron filters, and swabs. They're few and rare but they're there.
clever 
Ah damnation 23 is delicious! Second only to its cousin Pliny the elder 
I appreciated this read.
Not until you've killed a hobo.
Cant wait for Nas.Com
LOOK, MY COUNTRY IS BETTER THAN YOUR COUNTRY.
Provide citation from that signed bill that proves American citizens can be indefinitely detained or terror suspects no longer have access to civilian trials.  After all, the *burden of proof* for your claims is your responsibility in political, academic, or any other kind of debate.  Until, you provide citation that supports those claims about NDAA, you are just another unfortunate person regurgitating unsupported talking points.  (Hint:  Lots of us have already read President Obama's signing statement regarding NDAA and know it clearly states the indefinite detention of American citizens is not allowed).
Are you sure your breasts are up to it?
Im still laughing.
It doesn't matter if HE enforces them, they are there to be enforced by someone and combined with the bill that strips a national's citizenship, it IS a problem.
Lol, yup.
Do they think that it's related to the fracking?
Callense todos, los tazos y los tamales son de mexico que no saben nada?
Stay safe at night, sleep with a fire fighter.
About $750
Awesome.
When I was in Oregon, my friend ordered a salmon and pineapple pizza. I choked down a slice as not to be rude. An hour later, I burped and then puked a few moments later.
Thanks, that's what I thought it did. I know it acts on selected opioid receptors which are not known for euphoric properties. Thanks for the information :)
Depending on one's mood, one could: Pretend to not know English, go stealth mode, act like a deranged lunatic, or laugh. If you have a portable reciprocating saw, you could also cut out the tiles around you, and fall, still on the toilet, to the floor below.
Hooters is better
Only gripe about HC for me is the fucking USAS with frag, fuck that shit.
I'm pretty sure racism covers more than just "I hate 100% of black people 100% percent of the time." Race was a factor in the media's perception of Peyton Hillis last year, and that definitely had some influence in his inclusion on the ballot.
Possible explanation: Barty does a great Moody impression, hahah. I mean, he *did* have a very long time to prepare himself.
I have not been proven wrong, everyone glosses over what I wrote even though it's completely valid. The last sentence is merely opinion, but everything else is the truth. Good on you though for contributing nothing.
Driving in GTA IV is pretty key gameplay mechanic, there's not just the odd driving mission like the tank one in GoW, there are plenty of driving missions because you're stealing cars and escaping from cops. I don't think it's too much for the devs to ask that you figure out to drive by the time the driving missions role around.
No you're not stupid, don't change it.  Coin flips are not the most accurate randomizations of a 50% chance.  There has been a lot of research done that most coin flips do not rotate enough to be randomized enough.  Just google it.   6 sided dice, given enough tosses in the hand, are a much better way of generating a random 50/50 chance.  Oh I like your cards btw.
They are obviously not using a DNS block if other subreddits work.
I started with my right because that's the way we were being taught but it wasn't very comfortable.  After a couple of days I switched to my left hand and haven't changed it since.  I want to learn to be ambidextrous though, so I've got a stack of worksheets I'm going to try over the coming weeks.
Wait... So does he have you locked up keeping you from going out? I don't understand.
Drunk roommate coming in from where he had passed out on the front porch and yelling something very loud and incomprehensible at us.
Yer welcome to help me with a daily voting website/iVote ap. :)  ...long as their 500ish votes on proposed laws coincide with 330,000,000 citizen votes on the matter, they will keep their seats in office. ;)
This is one of the worst officiated games I've seen so far.  
What if that's a lie?!
Similar, she did it while I was getting a BJ.  It hurt to bad so I told her stop.  She thought I was cumming when I grunted in pain.  I look down she looks like freaking vampire blood dripping blood down her mouth.  
My dearest princess will always be beautiful
[relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Xhdj82K4e9k)
Mr. Literal Larry. I know you know what they mean and I am disappoint.
Alone here, a thousand kilometres away from my friends, family and girlfriend.  Give me a dozen reds.
My husband and I ride.  I just started last month.  He's been riding for years.  He just got back from a great ride. Yes, it's wet.  If you're not comfortable in that, don't ride.  If you are, then you're golden.  Yes there are hills.  There are routes so that you can avoid the worst of the hills for either lights or rain.  If all else fails, there's a great bus system in place.  I'm still pretty much a fair weather rider, but I've been out a bunch of times since I got my endorsement last month.  Even several times this week.  I got rained on once, but I have waterproof gear, so I didn't care, other than being my first time in the rain.  The other drivers around here seem to be ok with cyclists.  At least I haven't noticed a problem yet.  But even when driving I like Seattle drivers.  However, we moved from NC three years ago where you need to develop a sixth sense against the idiocy of driving there.  So *anywhere* seems tame and normal after that for 10 years.  People use turn signals here to indicate a turn.  Other drivers see that and respect it.  There are far fewer tailgaters here.  The pace is generally much much slower, about the speed limit rather than 20 mph above it.  The roads are noisier, though. There are quite a few Seattleites over on /r/motorcycles.  So you can pose your question there and get a much more rider centric view on it.  I haven't ridden anywhere else, but I like riding here.  So much to see and do, fun roads and straight roads, highways and country roads.  My husband likes to drive up to the mountains, turn around and come home.  
Link?
I like how it draws attention to the stretch marks.
have you seen it!?
I googled a random youtube playlist that had the format  http://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=_____________  And looking at the chilleddubstepmusic page and then going to the playlists, the url http://www.youtube.com/user/ChilledDubstepMusic?ob=video-mustangbase#p/c/7CFC0438B72B8C00 contained a string of numbers and letters at the end which i assumed was a playlist ID. So I just copy-pasted it.
Doctors, as in your family physician, are *not* scientists. They are not trained in research nor trained like scientists are in not mistaking correlation for causation, in proper methodology to reduce confirmation or other biases. As such, when a doctor thinks there's a link, just because they've seen a few cases, isn't really better than anecdotal evidence. It's certainly not research-quality data.
20-12 Sabres!!
They are officially licensed games. They just weren't *developed* by Nintendo.
Disagree the last thing we need on the kessel lupul line is another scorer. I think Crosby. 
NO DADDY NOT LADDER NOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!
It took him 4 weeks to photoshop that?  That's pretty slow.
So you'd prefer we assume that you're actually an inhuman jerk, instead of just pretending to be one on the web for the lulz? Duly noted. 
So why did you open the thread and make this post? I can only assume you have a sense of superiority. Good for you.
yeah, I'm really curious as to how this wonderfull beverage is made.
Sounds like you've got [information disease!](http://www.salon.com/2011/08/31/sirota_stupidphones/singleton/)
Capable of cursing? Yes. Capable of forming complete sentences that actually make sense? Nope.
I see in other posts you are citing instances when farmers try to save seed to plant in the new year.  I just would like let you know that this is so very very rare.  The losses a farmer faces in yield from losing hybrid vigor are much to large for seed cleaning to be a viable enterprise for any farmer.
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; No. I'd be so pissed if I caught my boyfriend stretching out my victoria secret panties with his hairy balls.
Tedious, yes. Boring, certainly. But you forgot to mention *eternal*. 
I really like Insomnium, but differentiating between their songs is very difficult.
I came for the beers.
Then it may become mandatory 
must find every episode
I added you
Everything that you mentioned is all graphics as in complete bullshit that doesn't effect gameplay. Bullet drop is the same, hit registration is just as bad. The old maps could have supported 64 players if they added more spawn points all of these features were possible before they just restricted them. Your argument for why it is different is that they released the game they promised 3 years ago and labeled everything that should have been in the last game as a new feature?
It seems the game has been to proclaim the NDAA does not apply to citizens, so let it go through - then come in through the back door and amend it with another bill, Lieberman's S. 1698: Enemy Expatriation Act which allows the government to remove your citizenship and then use NDAA on you: "A bill to add engaging in or supporting hostilities against the United States to the list of acts for which United States nationals would lose their nationality."  http://www.govtrack.us/congress/bill.xpd?bill=s112-1698
They don't sell health insurance that has a longer term. Life insurance is a different thing. There are one time payment policies and sometimes there are price increase agreements. With health insurance like car insurance they reserve the right to change the underwriting with the renewal.
Anyone who drives down Dundas during rush hour is going to be late anyways. Pick a better route, or just get on that streetcar you can't seem to pass.
That's just speculation, in the face of fact: had they gotten the goal, you're looking at a 4-2 loss for England either way. That being said, England's problems are much, much deeper than a goal that they should have been awarded. And Germany, well, in my opinion, they are the new Spain. A relatively young team that is now coming into its time and that I expect to do very well in the coming years.
wow you must be pretty anoying to conterfeat that nice body
Obama has the *power* to do that. Just like any other president who is elected in the future (now that the bill has been signed). I don't think his reassurances will stand up to scrutiny when he establishes martial law.   &gt;"jk guys! I really just wanted a police force."
Maybe that's why they were all protesting. Leggo my Eggos!
She was happily rewarded afterwards as well!
Is Seattle close enough?
Leaf clouds I call 'em.
People DO NOT understand what libertarianism is.  It's not something you want thrust upon you.  It's something you want a society to choose.  I'm actually a free market anarchist, and we always talk about outgrowing the need for the state, not overthrowing it, or shrinking it down to nothing.
I had that one at first, then I switched it out for strife. Haha.
Come on. This is the [/r/airsoft](/r/airsoft) way! Do it!
TIL there is a bostontrees subreddit
But how will you hold your drink??
It isn't really drinking. You are taking 0.5ml to 2.0ml of ethanol, and a regular beer will have 18ml of ethanol in it, so don't be too concerned over 'drinking' :P
In what way is that Jirachi legit? Caught in tall grass? If you don't mind Action Replay pokemon, why not just download the legendaries you're missing off of a gts emulator?
tip, dont blow your load in under 1 min!
Peanut butter. 
I like this idea of choosing people in the corporation to take to court. Can we go back to that?
Well....that's enough of reading this thread for a little while....
Already have it, sorry.
I don't get it - are you looking for someone else's opinion to agree with?  I think it's good that you want to read more and get more involved in politics, but it sounds like you're looking for a pre-existing box to fall into.  I would recommend reading up on philosophy instead of politics. Politicians have always wanted to change your opinions, which means you won't ever *really* discover "where you fall on the map".
I've seen a picture of that.  My eyes still bleed.
Like? Snowboarding is a fucking fortune. Riding a bike (HOLY SHIT I HAVE TO BUY A BIKE?) is expensive. I can't go rollerblading in the middle of fucking winter. Give me an example of something that is cheap and fun year round.
Coupons? http://steamcommunity.com/profiles/76561198044177679/inventory/#753
Dark souls isn't artificial difficulty at all. For instance after I beat the game, went back through on NG+ and decided to make a new character. I beat the entire game and maybe only died once or twice. The game is the reverse of artificial difficulty (which would be something like those wii games that take a simple task and make it impossible with a bunch of bullshit).
&gt; The weather is English so you won't miss the rain and gales.   "and there's bears".
So no other surfers where you are too?
Haha it was me and my friends. I lied in the title!
Don't Feed the Trolls!
Hermeneutically, you cannot work without some theory, or without some fact. The question is whether we test those theories against new facts or not.
Please make this a comment of it's own so other see it, everyone in this thread isn't as informed as you are and are spouting off opinions that make obama look like a fool when in reality he made the best possible move.
like digital mystikz? I love dmz 
it's so they can watch us easier
The most appropriate use of this I've seen.
Yeah, but, i mean... I thought the point of secret santa was a gift exchange between redditors, not a "sign up for reddit to participate" thing. 
^ should be top comment. This only applies to people committing acts of war. Lots of fearmongering in here.
your eve flair proves you pwn on a regular basis
Why?  $100M isn't unlimited money.
I recently got to the yellow dragon and ragequit. It was taking so painfully long to level up to a desirable level, mostly because the battle scenes took FOREVER to get over with. Loved every minute of it (aside from those) though. Now I am sad because my husbands psone recently died on us.
Wow man, this is radical!
Always.
Upvotes!
I feel like the words "friendship" and/or "magic" should be in here somewhere. Most of the Elements of Harmony keywords appear in the standard-transformation-sequence dialogue, but I would have been much happier with "By your magic combined... I am Captain Friendship!"  That said, this is still awesome-looking and funny and a good parody. Upvoted. :)
4 Coal for E.Y.E.?
Art of Flight, makes me want to snowboard every single day. I put the soundtrack on loop when boarding, amazing. 
To not have a New Years Resolution. 
Its a pretty nice dress. I'd have invited you to the new years ball im going to. It would be nice, as I'm going without a date. :|
It could have been a product of her subconsious creating a "random" number. Brains are cool like that.
Seriously?
[I stole it, **cracker**](//#successfulnegro)
Ooooo... button...
No, you may only enjoy the World Wide Web. Your ignorance is not wanted in other parts of Internet.
My Ass Rides In Navy Equipmet = Pwnd by the Navy
What happens when Obama points out how he's being forced into a corner?  He's called weak and gets two minutes of air time while those who call him weak and a sell-out get the next 58, and that's on the more "friendly" networks.  Look what's happening on Reddit, anyone who in the last weeks has presented an argument of two paragraphs or more, *while pointing to and quoting the damn bills provisions*, are downvoted and ridiculed while those who flip the president the bird get upvoted just for doing so.  
Sadly it's The Invention of Lying, the least funny thing Ricky Gervais ever wrote.
Cannabeer.
The country has been and is pretty much fucked now, so its not about voting for who you want to run the country. This time you'll be voting on your preferred method of destruction.
Husband works overnights right now, sadly.  I may drive over to see him, eat a sandwich, sneak a quick champagne toast and then head to bed.  It sounds awesome in theory, but we'll see how long I manage to stay up, my record over the past couple weeks has been aaabout 10:30pm, hah!  Enjoy the fireworks, I hope you're awake. =D
TIL pornos had a storyline.
Damn, now I can really tell I am straight. Shit, this should be the meter of straightdom!
Back in 2002, we Americans were being told of a connection between Iraq and 9/11 -- remember the supposed meeting between Mohammed Atta and Saddam in Czechoslovakia?  That turned out to be all lies. And now those lies are being recycled and fed anew to gullible Americans, With "Iran" in place of "Iraq".  Gareth Porter offers a comprehensive debunking of the recent show-trial verdict.  See ["Crackpot Anti-Islam Activists, ‘Serial Fabricators,’ and the Tale of Iran and 9/11"](http://original.antiwar.com/porter/2011/12/30/the-tale-of-iran-and-911/), *Truthout*, 31 Dec 2011.  Incredibly, the witnesses were not cross-examined!  Porter also summarizes Iran's record of cooperation with the U.S. in the apprehension of Al Qaeda.  Let's recall that Iran itself is a victim of terrorism -- most of it the work of MeK.  . .  We should not be complacent, but there are at least a few signs that our vehement opposition to another U.S.-initiated war may be having an effect.  Recently, the neo-con high-priests at the American Enterprise Institute admitted that Iran is *not* a nuclear threat.  In Israel the former head of the Mossad, Meir Dagan, has called the planned attack on Iran ["the stupidest thing I've ever heard"](http://www.haaretz.com/news/diplomacy-defense/former-mossad-chief-israel-air-strike-on-iran-stupidest-thing-i-have-ever-heard-1.360367).  And now the current head of the Mossad, Tamir Pardo, is saying that [Iran does *not* pose an existential threat to Israel](http://news.antiwar.com/2011/12/30/mossad-chief-iranian-nuclear-weapon-wouldnt-be-existential-threat/).  Hard to believe, but our rulers may actually be sobering up!
Too human's combat system definitely deserves a shoutout for worst game mechanic ever.   Funnily enough, one of my favorites came from the same developer - Eternal Darkness's sanity effects.
'Not cricket' is reserved for the most deprived of situations! 
Yes, that's what heterosexual men want to be, "cute."
Well I told my only redditor friend that I got 400 up votes, although I didn't mention getting -20 comment karma...
I am pointing out the obvious falsehood that this program has merit educationally.  If it has any medical merit, it is simply a species of Tylenol given, a financial decision made with humans as stock, as money, because it's cheaper. Eugenics by this same guiding logic is a sensible plan, too.  Human life is incalculable, the $60K would be better spent opening another bed someplace, diverting resources from an ill-defined and questionable measure to a visibly working one.  The problem of addiction is mental and spiritual:  if you are in a hole, stop digging. The suffering is a result of human choice, weakness, arrogance, greed, folly.  Crackheads - and watch this now because it is the key missing concept - *know* that they are crackheads. Really.  True story.  This foppish and weak half-measure designed by bleeding hearts so-called is evidence of an unconscionable failure to think matters through and acknowledge simple facts.  Sophistry, milk-sop sentimentality and reactivity, and politics - in a word, human nature - are to blame for the problems of addiction.  Fracture that central concept any way you wish, you still have a piece of the same pie.  Please downvote me further, or if you can, expose the falsity of what I say.  Puerile ingrates are the result of same.  These people need help, and this measure will merely help to extend their suffering.  Enter any store in the neighbourhood; these pipes and their related paraphernalia are sold, in some cases openly.  A wee rose in a glass tube, other 'glassware'.  It is only slightly different to sell one of these to a person than it is to give them one:  the net result to the crack user is exactly the same.  Think about that and rebut it, because it is the direction that the idea is thrusting in; diverting users less and not more from their road to destruction, into deepened and not lessened misery, as they walk the common road to death multifarious.
Last TNA. They are doing "random" couplings of people for tag matches. I thought it was gonna suck but Joe and Magnus have been great together. This time they were up against EY and ODB. Rofls ensued.
of DEA?
Watch out, we got a badass over here!
It always worked for me (my parent's liked to ground me by taking away my connections to the outside world as well)
I'd spend $10 more and get the [Razer Onza TOURNAMENT EDITION](http://www.razerzone.com/minisite/onza) 360 controller.  The cables are really long and it feels amazing in your hands.  I also like the resistance you can put on the sticks, which makes flying in games like BF3 easier... and you can set custom controls with the settings on the back of the controller.
Um, if you're planning on crossfire/sli, you may need a stronger psu.
Ctrl + f and no Jolly rogers?
Why do you say "white rights" groups are dangerous? Either all ethnic rights groups are dangerous, or none of them are. That is equality. What you are advocating is discrimination based on ethnicity, which is the reason people have been exploited in the first place!  Whether or not the agenda of this "white rights" caucus might terrible, it should be judged on it's own merits, not based on the history we are trying to move away from.
Changed.  And damn, didn't notice the Skywrath Mage one.
It was suggested by others in the community.  I simply yelled out something that was being discussed.  That's leadership. :)
After watching the winter classic earlier... it will take some adjustment to get used to the speed.  I think everyone will look like they are flying for awhile.  Go leafs!
da da, da da da. da da da.
&gt;In that case, you'd probably feel right at home  Poland isn't empty/agricultural if that's what you meant. That's why the land is kind of expensive.
My boyfriend, and maybe some other randoms.
I wish your post would've been more specific when you first made it, seeing as I cannot use the theme and you got my hopes up. However, you did inspire me to search for a ICS reddit reader, and I stumpled upon [Reddit News](https://market.android.com/details?id=reddit.news#?t=W251bGwsMSwxLDIxMiwicmVkZGl0Lm5ld3MiXQ..) with an ICS theme.   So indirectly, I feel compelled to thank you.
With Minecraft, RAM=FPS.
Even if only 1/3rd did?
03 Protegé 5-speed (basically the model year before your car, bro) I bought for 5k with 48k miles on it.  Best deal of my life. First stick of my life. Top reason I'm sad the world's running out of oil (I doubt we'll have stick electrics).
I accidentally killed that stray dog, because I first ran into him while I was being attacked by wolves at night. I thought he was another wolf... :(
What is it? Dragons?
People like the idiot on Facebook that made that pic aren't supposed to understand memes. That's part of what makes them funny. As long as those people stay off reddit and stay on Facebook, I'm happy. From a redditor's point of view, facebook is for viewing idiots in their natural environment, filled with other idiots.
No,the only thing that I could think of that happened would be that I let it die by accident the day before this all happened,and it took about a half hour to load entirely
No, bigotry towards gays.
Then he doesn't mean that one, does he.
I personally like stubble. It makes a man so much more masculine. It's the penultimate of sexy.
The fucking loser sounds like hes from N4G. 
I live in the city, so I have a lot of them.  One day I was walking down the street and this homeless guy, instead of asking for change, just goes "Ah, you're wearin' beach colors!"  The best times were with my boyfriend, though. The first time he came to the city we were walking and a homeless guy said to my boyfriend, "You guys are a great couple! If you wrote a book, I would buy it." Another time, a homeless guy who was peeing in an alley said "Y'all still looking great together!" and then later tried to pass us saying, "Man, you in my way, but you got a fine girl."  ETA: One time this older non-threatening seeming woman came up to me, looked me straight in the eye, and goes "Are you fucking with me?"
No matter what set up your opponent is running bottom there is a counter.  I can't say that I agree with making blanket statements like this.  I mean if you are running burst+cc then you can beat poke for example.
Because your average fps player in the year 2011 (2012?) is a 15 year old who just wants to watch blood spray everywhere.
Here is [mine:](http://buckywootmaster.me/wp-content/uploads/IMG_1327.jpg)
Holy Shit! This is exactly what happened to me last time I smoked and tried to watch Episode III
The contest just closed. People in /r/assistance were downvoting the offer so it won't show up on the front page of that subreddit and they will be the only ones who could see it. It just goes to show you the type of people trolling this site. I posted on here so that more people could see it and have a chance at getting something.
Bro-five!
And then sometimes there's a time and a place for RES  &gt;source  [](/c01 "&lt;3 you too") 
Try subscribing to r/dwarffortress, every now and then you see a post asking for the best way to kill a bunch of cats, confusing as hell.
Madagascar has nothing on this shit. Bring on the pandemic.
"I was saying if this was all in my head then no one could prove or disprove that I actually saw it"  Thats not what you said, you said that only schizoids could prove or disprove what you saw, and if it was in your head they could disprove or prove it as much as anyone else. They cant. Nobody can disprove anything that happend inside someone elses head.   Tho, considering your illness we can with certainly say that it was just a silly illusion.  
Millions of people believe in various deities, it doesn't mean they're right nonetheless.   Have an upvote anyway. Cheers!
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
I was on a bus to work to bring in the new year. forever alone
[r/HomestarRunner](http://www.reddit.com/r/HomestarRunner/)
Both you and Lifeaftercollege are not giving any references or sources, your arguments are invalid.
I read this in Wrex's voice from Mass Effect.
You're making money, can't beat that. You here at the African resort? 
Who buys a macbook for gaming...
there is like 2 check outs. the code gets put in after you check out on paypal.
not bad but have it already. Thanks. 
Watch out, the laker minions are about to catch hold of this comment
[I know that feel bro, I know that feel.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OXlZ6edCHqI)
I should have mentioned, it was limited to 500 words or less, so that's why she decided to write it more as a character portrait or vignette. I don't know the terminology, so that's my fault for calling it a story I guess. Thanks for the feedback though!
I still got to see some tits so it's all good :-)
Happy New Year reddit! I passed over going to a pretty big party with a guestlist/bouncers and all the trimmings to browse you, read my book and eat chicken in my pants. I regret nothing.
I've heard good things about the m audio bx5a, can you vouch for that? Or do you have a preference? I'm liking those even more because I've found them for about $150 new
I heard about NG from his IAMA. Haven't stopped listening constantly since then. 
He's ready to rip your soul out.
so proud to see a swiss footballer in that kind of list. thanks Shaq
May 2012 bring you 1080p
We didn't know that until we got there around 8:30. By their site it seemed like no reservations at all. But we're planning on stopping by earlier next time and doing that. This party of 4 next to us waited for like 4 hours x_x
On topic (kind of), I watched the 2 girls video and considering all I've heard, I was like, "That's it?" I don't know if I'm messed up or what, but I haven't seen anything on the internet that truly shocked me or make me feel sick. 
Good, fuck him.
I'm more than Ok with that.
This can be said about almost every question on here.
Forever alone with Vette... :\  I guess I'll go find Jack in Mass Effect 3
[It didn't help I clicked another link immediately before this post.](http://imgur.com/W6FA8)
&gt; Once played a ZvZ. **I got offensively gg'd** during a push of his, then I held and countered, proceeding to dismantle his army and take him out.  &gt; What does he do? Expands everywhere across the map and sends ling and muta harassment squads to try and snipe me whilst refusing to leave the game and **literally throwing every single insult at me in the dictionary, and demanding that I leave because he "rightfully won."**
not to mention that Einstein was on the fence about religion and even claimed to have a God only he had a different belief about him so using Einstien would only make you look stupid.
To the extent that he identifies as a conservative, Paul considers himself a paleoconservative.  The point being that what he criticizes in conservatives is their leftist deviation from what he takes to be orthodox conservatism.  Paleos believe that the Republican Party and conservative movement were hijacked by the leftist, ex-Trotskyite neocons.  
Agreed.  Bush was compared to a monkey all the time.  I agree that historically, comparing people who happened to be black to monkeys has been used with racist connotations, but that does not mean *everyone* who makes the comparison is automatically being racist by doing so.  You can't assume what is in a person's heart.  Also, being ignorant, such as to the sensitivity of an issue, is not necessarily the same thing as being bigoted.  I also get very suspicious when the only people crying "racism/sexism/etc." happen to be from a group not allegedly targeted by the remark/comparison/etc. in question.
I was shot 5 times in the leg, hit with a baseball bat to the head twice and had 6 fingers broken.
[](/b18) 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chemical_castration covers the pros/cons pretty well.  Not mentioned in the wiki is the fact that chemical castration also delays the onset of male pattern baldness by suppressing testosterone.  Though... it's a high price to pay for a full head of hair.
Probably because I didn't contribute at all to the subreddit, but I still feel this is an appropriate way to thank you all for the numerous quality drams I've enjoyed :) 
What?  Oh, wait, you mean being released from prison. Don't even get me started on our prison system here in America. We take muggers and make them murderers.
Why is the album called 'suck a dick Reddit'?
let us know how it was when you come back lol
cigarettes
What exactly is this symbol of free thinking he's going to wear?
No mention of Real Genius?
yes but it is very difficult to over eat if I'm not eating carbs thats my point.  Ninja edit: to be more specific I understand that I could also lose weight and still consume carbs but then I would need to plan as you say by counting calories to make sure I don't over eat. By not having carbs in my diet I don't have to count calories because it is almost impossible to over eat when dieting on meats and veggies alone.
Got [these](http://imgur.com/a/qq1nJ#0) off a site a while back, they are not my own, but I uploaded them for ya.
Strange how much of a dick a forge looks like at this angle.
&gt;I expect NDAA was put through to give them the power to round up dissidents, OWS and the like, and SOPA will be put through to allow them to quash internet sites that foment dissent.  here we agree, i think all thats possible and it shouldnt be.  the law shouldnt have passed.  &gt;Monarch, Oligarch, Plutarch. Whatever.  my point is those are different things
Jumping into cars in Saints Row 3. Entering vehicles in other games will forever seem slow as fuck.
No thank you
This man is correct
any ideas for a replacement technology? I've got none
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5es0NNtSNCU
The indefinite detention portions will likely face a court challenge, and maybe even go all the way to Supreme Court. A precedent has already been set, too (Hamdi vs Rumsfeld).
As a service member I would have been fine with him telling the Republicans to fuck off. Yes I realize I am the minority.
That's one of the best rages I've ever seen.
Man I feel bad for ya, I'm sitting her blazed with my parents watching Beavis and Butthead waiting for the New Years show. True story
Let the wins speak for themselves.  I personally try not to make any judgements about my opponent and let that person's skill at the game do the talking.  You will also find that terrible players complain in same fashion you spoke of, regardless of who they are playing against.  
This game was awesome! I was very young when I played it though, and I remember it scared me a bit.
Models (actresses/musicians/etc) are a human with flaws that have the resources to spackle on perfection.   I feel sorry for the folks who think that what they see is in any way "natural"  [Case in point](http://www.makeherup.com/2010/12/30/russell-brand-posts-picture-of-katy-perry-makeup-free-and-in-bed/).
Alex is such an annoying vagina
I used to use an AVR-3308, the older version of the Denon AVR-3312CI. I was really happy with the Dolby Digital / DTS decoding, and it does a good job with 2 channel as well. I don't have much experience with recent Onkyo hardware.  If you hook it up via HDMI, you'll get the Dolby TrueHD and DTS-HD Master Audio streams from BluRay, where optical can only do Dolby Digital / DTS.
Your name obviously doesn't suite you that well.
This is the smallest size, too. I'm around 5'7", 140lbs. I don't know if it's just meant to be big or if it's made for really tall people haha
Is that necessarily true? I mean i could flip a coin for eternity and only get heads, even if its equally likely to get tails. It doesn't mean I HAVE to get tails.  But mmmmm emma watson :3
Because people want to "beat" the AI, it is rewarding to know you outsmarted them. If they then will just counter your trick then you can't ever say that you've beat it.
Seven reference. upvote
I accidentally installed MBAM in German once, and it was kind of neat to go through it without being able to read anything. I kind of had all of the buttons and everything memorized though.
I pissed in the same urinal as you!!
I believe you can donate to erowid.org and receive this as a gift.
[This](http://www.iliketheinternet.com/funabet.html) might be it
happy new year [](/sad) 
Glad you got out man. Be careful out there. Take care :)
Ah! Petland and others of their ilk always end up luring me inside as well, despite my better judgement.  When I was quite young, I had farmer neighbors up the road who kept a handful of rabbits in hutches. Once, they took them out of the hutches one by one and let me hold and pet them. Fortunately I was too young then to comprehend their eventual fate, or I might have led a lapine insurrection.  When I was about twelve, I went to the county fair and saw a booth where they had rabbits for sale, including this huge specimen for $50, probably a Flemish Giant or Chinchilla, in retrospect, though specific details of appearance escape me. Anyway, I positively begged my mother to let me buy it with my accumulated allowance, but she refused... wisely comprehending that I was more eager to possess the rabbit than to care for it.  Glad to hear that you keep multiple rabbits; given the social nature of most varieties (and their relatively short history of domestication as house pets) they are certainly far happier for the company than they would be alone.
This whole cop out that it does not apply to American citizens is SUCH bullshit...  Why are non-Americans some form of subhuman that only deserves 3/5ths of the rights as an American.?  The right to due process is an inalienable right which EVERYONE has...  It's ONLY the right to confront your accuser.  It's NOT a get out of jail free card.  Adolf Hitler, Osama Bin Ladin ... military combatants, etc. I don't give a SHIT who this is... they all deserve the right to a trial.  NOT because I give a SHIT about their rights, but because the rights of the innocent people swept up in some bullshit charge MUST be protected.  Further, say you ARE an american citizen and you did something foolish like date a girl who's father is a Muslim fanatic... and the Gov things you're involved... and you ARE an American citizen.  They'll just disappear your ass and say they don't have you.  That the only people they have in custody are enemy combatants.  And because there is NO due process/habeas corpus, the lawyer can't bring these non-persons in front of a judge to prove the state wrong.  Fuck Obama... this is fucking WWII Nazi shit...  I gave him the maximum campaign contribution in 2008... he's not getting SHIT from me in 2012.
Hmm, not sure how this game escaped my radar, but I had never even heard of it before today. And already 3-4 people have suggested it to me.   Maybe because I specified L4D?
Thanks for the piece of coal!
Gotta cup 'em all, PokeBra!
Most people don't. I suppose that it's both a blessing (as PC titles and hardware go for cheaper) and a curse (as it tends to be less well-kept and in worse condition).
toutch grind and toutch grind bmx!!!!!! literally spent hours playing them
big bird isn't a pervert.
The 80's called, they want their you back.
The reason I say this is because the hardware survey apparently analyzes the computer that is to be used so if I do the survey it might not let your friend use it.
I had this same thought.  I imagine it went something like (in their heads):  -Guy in bandages waves gun around.  -At some point, the "hero" splinter cell protagonist comes in and subdues him or something.  -Everyone is happy the day is saved, and wants to be the one saving the day so buys their video game.
Keep trollin', trollin', trollin'...
Plug one red and one blue. Slam one red and one blue. Eat two reds and two blues.   For science. 
They're always called Rocky
